Ta. Sin. These are revelations of the Quran and a Scripture that maketh plain;
A guidance and good tidings for believers
Who establish worship and pay the poor-due and are sure of the Hereafter.
Lo! as for those who believe not in the Hereafter, We have made their works fairseeming unto them so that they are all astray.
Those are they for whom is the worst of punishment, and in the Hereafter they will be the greatest losers.
Lo! as for thee (Muhammad), thou verily receivest the Quran from the presence of One Wise, Aware.
(Remember) when Moses said unto his household: Lo! I spy afar off a fire; I will bring you tidings thence, or bring to you a borrowed flame that ye may warm yourselves.
But when he reached it, he was called, saying: Blessed is Whosoever is in the fire and Whosoever is round about it! And Glorified be Allah, the Lord of the Worlds!
O Moses! Lo! it is I, Allah, the Mighty, the Wise.
And throw down thy staff! But when he saw it writhing as it were a demon, he turned to flee headlong; (but it was said unto him): O Moses! Fear not! the emissaries fear not in My presence,
Save him who hath done wrong and afterward hath changed evil for good. And lo! I am Forgiving, Merciful.
And put thy hand into the bosom of thy robe, it will come forth white but unhurt. (This will be one) among nine tokens unto Pharaoh and his people Lo! they were ever evil-living folk.
But when Our tokens came unto them, plain to see, they said: This is mere magic,
And they denied them, though their souls acknowledged them, for spite and arrogance. Then see the nature of the consequence for the wrong-doers!
And We verily gave knowledge unto David and Solomon, and they said: Praise be to Allah, Who hath preferred us above many of His believing slaves!
And Solomon was Davids heir. And he said: O mankind! Lo! we have been taught the language of birds, and have been given (abundance) of all things. This surely is evident favour.
And there were gathered together unto Solomon his armies of the jinn and humankind, and of the birds, and they were set in battle order;
Till, when they reached the Valley of the Ants, an ant exclaimed: O ants! Enter your dwellings lest Solomon and his armies crush you, unperceiving.
And (Solomon) smiled, laughing at her speech, and said: My Lord, arouse me to be thankful for Thy favour wherewith Thou hast favoured me and my parents, and to do good that shall be pleasing unto Thee, and include me in (the number of) Thy righteous slaves.
And he sought among the birds and said: How is it that I see not the hoopoe, or is he among the absent ?
I verily will punish him with hard punishment or I verily will slay him, or he verily shall bring me a plain excuse.
But he was not long in coming, and he said: I have found out (a thing) that thou apprehendest not, and I come unto thee from Sheba with sure tidings.
Lo! I found a woman ruling over them, and she hath been given (abundance) of all things, and hers is a mighty throne.
I found her and her people worshipping the sun instead of Allah; and Satan maketh their works fairseeming unto them, and debarreth them from the way (of Truth), so that they go not aright;
So that they worship not Allah, Who bringeth forth the hidden in the heavens and the earth, and knoweth what ye hide and what ye proclaim,
Allah; there is no God save Him, the Lord of the Tremendous Throne.
(Solomon) said: We shall see whether thou speakest truth or whether thou art of the liars.
Go with this my letter and throw it down unto them; then turn away and see what (answer) they return,
(The Queen of Sheba) said (when she received the letter): O chieftains! Lo! there hath been thrown unto me a noble letter.
Lo! it is from Solomon, and lo! it is: In the name of Allah, the Beneficent, the Merciful;
Exalt not yourselves against me, but come unto me as those who surrender.
She said: O chieftains! Pronounce for me in my case. I decide no case till ye are present with me.
They said: We are lords of might and lords of great prowess, but it is for thee to command; so consider what thou wilt command.
She said: Lo! kings, when they enter a township, ruin it and make the honour of its people shame. Thus will they do.
But lo! I am going to send a present unto them, and to see with what (answer) the messengers return.
So when (the envoy) came unto Solomon, (the King) said: What! Would ye help me with wealth ? But that which Allah hath given me is better than that which He hath given you. Nay it is ye (and not I) who exult in your gift.
Return unto them. We verily shall come unto them with hosts that they cannot resist, and we shall drive them out from thence with shame, and they will be abased.
He said: O chiefs! Which of you will bring me her throne before they come unto me, surrendering ?
A stalwart of the jinn said: I will bring it thee before thou canst rise from thy place. Lo! I verily am strong and trusty for such work.
One with whom was knowledge of the Scripture said: I will bring it thee before thy gaze returneth unto thee. And when he saw it set in his presence, (Solomon) said: This is of the bounty of my Lord, that He may try me whether I give thanks or am ungrateful. Whosoever giveth thanks he only giveth thanks for (the good of) his own soul; and whosoever is ungrateful (is ungrateful only to his own souls hurt). For lo! my Lord is Absolute in independence, Bountiful.
He said: Disguise her throne for her that we may see whether she will go aright or be of those not rightly guided.
So, when she came, it was said (unto her): Is thy throne like this ? She said: (It is) as though it were the very one. And (Solomon said): We were given the knowledge before her and we had surrendered (to Allah).
And (all) that she was wont to worship instead of Allah hindered her, for she came of disbelieving folk.
It was said unto her: Enter the hall. And when she saw it she deemed it a pool and bared her legs. (Solomon) said: Lo! it is a hall, made smooth, of glass. She said: My Lord! Lo! I have wronged myself, and I surrender with Solomon unto Allah, the Lord of the Worlds.
And We verily sent unto Thamud their brother Salih, saying: Worship Allah. And lo! they (then became two parties quarrelling.
He said: O my people! Why will ye hasten on the evil rather than the good ? Why will ye not ask pardon of Allah, that ye may receive mercy.
They said: We augur evil of thee and those with thee. He said: Your evil augury is with Allah. Nay, but ye are folk that are being tested.
And there were in the city nine persons who made mischief in the land and reformed not.
They said: Swear one to another by Allah that we verily will attack him and his household by night, and afterward we will surely say unto his friend: We witnessed not the destruction of his household. And lo! we are truthtellers.
So they plotted a plot: and We plotted a plot, while they perceived not.
Then see the nature of the consequence of their plotting, for lo! We destroyed them and their people, every one.
See, yonder are their dwellings empty and in ruins because they did wrong. Lo! herein is indeed a portent for a people who have knowledge.
And we saved those who believed and used to ward off (evil).
And Lot! when he said unto his folk: Will ye commit abomination knowingly ?
Must ye needs lust after men instead of women ? Nay, but ye are folk who act senselessly.
But the answer of his folk was naught save that they said: Expel the household of Lot from your township, for they (forsooth) are folk who would keep clean!
Then We saved him and his household save his wife; We destined her to be of those who stayed behind.
And We rained a rain upon them. Dreadful is the rain of those who have been warned.
Say (O Muhammad): Praise be to Allah, and peace be on His slaves whom He hath chosen! Is Allah best, or (all) that ye ascribe as partners (unto Him) ?
Is not He (best) Who created the heavens and the earth, and sendeth down for you water from the sky wherewith We cause to spring forth joyous orchards, whose trees it never hath been yours to cause to grow. Is there any God beside Allah ? Nay, but they are folk who ascribe equals (unto Him)!
Is not He (best) Who made the earth a fixed abode, and placed rivers in the folds thereof, and placed firm hills therein, and hath set a barrier between the two seas ? Is there any God beside Allah ? Nay, but most of them know not!
Is not He (best) Who answereth the wronged one when he crieth unto Him and removeth the evil, and hath made you viceroys of the earth ? Is there any God beside Allah ? Little do they reflect!
Is not He (best) Who guideth you in the darkness of the land and the sea, He Who sendeth the winds as heralds of His mercy ? Is there any God beside Allah ? High Exalted be Allah from all that they ascribe as partner (unto Him)!
Is not He (best) Who produceth creation, then reproduceth it, and Who provideth for you from the heaven and the earth ? Is there any God beside Allah ? Say: Bring your proof, if ye are truthful!
Say (O Muhammad): None in the heavens and the earth knoweth the Unseen save Allah; and they know not when they will be raised (again).
Nay, but doth their knowledge reach to the Hereafter ? Nay, for they are in doubt concerning it. Nay, for they cannot see it.
Yet those who disbelieve say: When we have become dust like our fathers, shall we verily be brought forth (again) ?
We were promised this, forsooth, we and our fathers. (All) this is naught but fables of the men of old.
Say (unto them, O Muhammad): Travel in the land and see the nature of the sequel for the guilty!
And grieve thou not for them, nor be in distress because of what they plot (against thee).
And they say: When (will) this promise (be fulfilled), if ye are truthful ?
Say: It may be that a part of that which ye would hasten on is close behind you.
Lo! thy Lord is full of bounty for mankind, but most of them do not give thanks.
Lo! thy Lord knoweth surely all that their bosoms hide, and all that they proclaim.
And there is nothing hidden in the heaven or the earth but it is in a clear Record.
Lo! this Quran narrateth unto the Children of Israel most of that concerning which they differ.
And lo! it is a guidance and a mercy for believers.
Lo! thy Lord will judge between them of His wisdom, and He is the Mighty, the Wise.
Therefor (O Muhammad) put thy trust in Allah, for thou (standest) on the plain Truth.
Lo! thou canst not make the dead to hear, nor canst thou make the deaf to hear the call when they have turned to flee;
Nor canst thou lead the blind out of their error. Thou canst make none to hear, save those who believe Our revelations and who have surrendered.
And when the word is fulfilled concerning them, We shall bring forth a beast of the earth to speak unto them because mankind had not faith in Our revelations.
And (remind them of) the Day when We shall gather out of every nation a host of those who denied Our revelations, and they will be set in array;
Till, when they come (before their Lord), He will say: Did ye deny My revelations when ye could not compass them in knowledge, or what was it that ye did ?
And the Word will be fulfilled concerning them because they have done wrong, and they will not speak.
Have they not seen how We have appointed the night that they may rest therein, and the day sight-giving ? Lo! therein verily are portents for a people who believe.
And (remind them of) the Day when the Trumpet will be blown, and all who are in the heavens and the earth will start in fear, save him whom Allah willeth. And all come unto Him, humbled.
And thou seest the hills thou deemest solid flying with the flight of clouds: the doing of Allah Who perfecteth all things. Lo! He is Informed of what ye do.
Whoso bringeth a good deed will have better than its worth; and such are safe from fear that Day.
And whoso bringeth an ill-deed, such will be flung down on their faces in the Fire. Are ye rewarded aught save what ye did ?
(Say): I (Muhammad) am commanded only to serve the Lord of this land which He hath hallowed, and unto Whom all things belong. And I am commanded to be of those who surrender (unto Him),
And to recite the Quran. And whoso goeth right, goeth right only for (the good of) his own soul; and as for him who goeth astray - (Unto him) say: Lo! I am only a warner.
And say: Praise be to Allah Who will show you His portents so that ye shall know them. And thy Lord is not unaware of what ye (mortals) do.
Ta. Sin. Mim.
These are revelations of the Scripture that maketh plain.
We narrate unto thee (somewhat) of the story of Moses and Pharaoh with truth, for folk who believe.
Lo! Pharaoh exalted himself in the earth and made its people castes. A tribe among them he oppressed, killing their sons and sparing their women. Lo! he was of those who work corruption.
And We desired to show favour unto those who were oppressed in the earth, and to make them examples and to make them the inheritors,
And to establish them in the earth, and to show Pharaoh and Haman and their hosts that which they feared from them.
And We inspired the mother of Moses, saying: Suckle him and, when thou fearest for him, then cast him into the river and fear not nor grieve. Lo! We shall bring him back unto thee and shall make him (one) of Our messengers.
And the family of Pharaoh took him up, that he might become for them an enemy and a sorrow, Lo! Pharaoh and Haman and their hosts were ever sinning.
And the wife of Pharaoh said: (He will be) a consolation for me and for thee. Kill him not. Peradventure he may be of use to us, or we may choose him for a son. And they perceived not.
And the heart of the mother of Moses became void, and she would have betrayed him if We had not fortified her heart, that she might be of the believers.
And she said unto his sister: Trace him. So she observed him from afar, and they perceived not.
And We had before forbidden foster-mothers for him, so she said: Shall I show you a household who will rear him for you and take care of him ?
So We restored him to his mother that she might be comforted and not grieve, and that she might know that the promise of Allah is true. But most of them know not.
And when he reached his full strength and was ripe, We gave him wisdom and knowledge. Thus do We reward the good.
And he entered the city at a time of carelessness of its folk, and he found therein two men fighting, one of his own caste, and the other of his enemies; and he who was of his caste asked him for help against him who was of his enemies. So Moses struck him with his fist and killed him. He said: This is of the devils doing. Lo! he is an enemy, a mere misleader.
He said: My Lord! Lo! I have wronged my soul, so forgive me. Then He forgave him. Lo! He is the Forgiving, the Merciful.
He said: My Lord! Forasmuch as Thou hast favoured me, I will nevermore be a supporter of the guilty.
And morning found him in the city, fearing, vigilant, when behold! he who had appealed to him the day before cried out to him for help. Moses said unto him: Lo! thou art indeed a mere hothead.
And when he would have fallen upon the man who was an enemy unto them both, he said: O Moses! Wouldst thou kill me as thou didst kill a person yesterday. Thou wouldst be nothing but a tyrant in the land, thou wouldst not be of the reformers.
And a man came from the uttermost part of the city, running. He said: O Moses! Lo! the chiefs take counsel against thee to slay thee; therefor escape. Lo! I am of those who give thee good advice.
So he escaped from thence, fearing, vigilant. He said: My Lord! Deliver me from the wrongdoing folk.
And when he turned his face toward Midian, he said: Peradventure my Lord will guide me in the right road.
And when he came unto the water of Midian he found there a whole tribe of men, watering. And he found apart from them two women keeping back (their flocks). He said: What aileth you ? The two said: We cannot give (our flocks) to drink till the shepherds return from the water; and our father is a very old man.
So he watered (their flock) for them. Then he turned aside into the shade, and said: My Lord! I am needy of whatever good Thou sendest down for me.
Then there came unto him one of the two women, walking shyly. She said: Lo! my father biddeth thee, that he may reward thee with a payment for that thou didst water (the flock) for us. Then, when he came unto him and told him the (whole) story, he said: Fear not! Thou hast escaped from the wrongdoing folk.
One of the two women said: O my father! Hire him! For the best (man) that thou canst hire in the strong, the trustworthy.
He said: Lo! I fain would marry thee to one of these two daughters of mine on condition that thou hirest thyself to me for (the term of) eight pilgrimages. Then if thou completest ten it will be of thine own accord, for I would not make it hard for thee. Allah willing, thou wilt find me of the righteous.
He said: That (is settled) between thee and me. Whichever of the two terms I fulfil, there will be no injustice to me, and Allah is Surety over what we say.
Then, when Moses had fulfilled the term, and was travelling with his housefolk, he saw in the distance a fire and said unto his housefolk: Bide ye (here). Lo! I see in the distance a fire; peradventure I shall bring you tidings thence, or a brand from the fire that ye may warm yourselves.
And when he reached it, he was called from the right side of the valley in the blessed field, from the tree: O Moses! Lo! I, even I, am Allah, the Lord of the Worlds;
Throw down thy staff. And when he saw it writhing as it had been a demon, he turned to flee headlong, (and it was said unto him): O Moses! Draw nigh and fear not. Lo! thou art of those who are secure.
Thrust thy hand into the bosom of thy robe it will come forth white without hurt. And guard thy heart from fear. Then these shall be two proofs from your Lord unto Pharaoh and his chiefs. Lo! they are evil-living folk.
He said: My Lord! Lo! I killed a man among them and I fear that they will kill me.
My brother Aaron is more eloquent than me in speech. Therefor send him with me as a helper to confirm me. Lo! I fear that they will give the lie to me.
He said: We will strengthen thine arm with thy brother, and We will give unto you both power so that they cannot reach you for Our portents. Ye twain, and those who follow you, will be the winners.
But when Moses came unto them with Our clear tokens, they said: This is naught but invented magic. We never heard of this among our fathers of old.
And Moses said: My Lord is Best Aware of him who bringeth guidance from His presence, and whose will be the sequel of the Home (of bliss). Lo! wrong-doers will not be successful.
And Pharaoh said: O chiefs! I know not that ye have a god other than me, so kindle for me (a fire), O Haman, to bake the mud; and set up for me a lofty tower in order that I may survey the God of Moses; and lo! I deem him of the liars.
And he and his hosts were haughty in the land without right, and deemed that they would never be brought back to Us.
Therefor We seized him and his hosts, and abandoned them unto the sea. Behold the nature of the consequence for evil-doers!
And We made them patterns that invite unto the Fire, and on the Day of Resurrection they will not be helped.
And We made a curse to follow them in this world, and on the Day of Resurrection they will be among the hateful.
And We verily gave the Scripture unto Moses after We had destroyed the generations of old: clear testimonies for mankind, and a guidance and a mercy, that haply they might reflect.
And thou (Muhammad) wast not on the western side (of the Mount) when We expounded unto Moses the commandment, and thou wast not among those present;
But We brought forth generations, and their lives dragged on for them. And thou wast not a dweller in Midian, reciting unto them Our revelations, but We kept sending (messengers to men).
And thou was not beside the Mount when We did call; but (the knowledge of it is) a mercy from thy Lord that thou mayst warn a folk unto whom no warner came before thee, that haply they may give heed.
Otherwise, if disaster should afflict them because of that which their own hands have sent before (them), they might say: Our Lord! Why sentest Thou no messenger unto us, that we might have followed Thy revelations and been of the believers ?
But when there came unto them the Truth from Our presence, they said: Why is he not given the like of what was given unto Moses ? Did they not disbelieve in that which was given unto Moses of old ? They say: Two magics that support each other; and they say: Lo! in both we are disbelievers.
Say (unto them, O Muhammad): Then bring a scripture from the presence of Allah that giveth clearer guidance than these two (that) I may follow it, if ye are truthful.
And if they answer thee not, then know that what they follow is their lusts. And who goeth farther astray than he who followeth his lust without guidance from Allah. Lo! Allah guideth not wrongdoing folk.
And now verily We have caused the Word to reach them, that haply they may give heed.
Those unto whom We gave the Scripture before it, they believe in it,
And when it is recited unto them, they say: We believe in it. Lo! it is the Truth from our Lord. Lo! even before it we were of those who surrender (unto Him).
These will be given their reward twice over, because they are steadfast and repel evil with good, and spend of that wherewith We have provided them,
And when they hear vanity they withdraw from it and say: Unto us our works and unto you your works. Peace be unto you! We desire not the ignorant.
Lo! thou (O Muhammad) guidest not whom thou lovest, but Allah guideth whom He will. And He is Best Aware of those who walk aright.
And they say: If we were to follow the Guidance with thee we should be torn out of our land. Have We not established for them a sure sanctuary, whereunto the produce of all things is brought (in trade), a provision from Our presence ? But most of them know not.
And how many a community have We destroyed that was thankless for its means of livelihood! And yonder are their dwellings, which have not been inhabited after them save a little. And We, even We, were the inheritors.
And never did thy Lord destroy the townships, till He had raised up in their mother(-town) a messenger reciting unto them Our revelations. And never did We destroy the townships unless the folk thereof were evil-doers.
And whatsoever ye have been given is a comfort of the life of the world and an ornament thereof; and that which Allah hath is better and more lasting. Have ye then no sense ?
Is he whom We have promised a fair promise which he will find (true) like him whom We suffer to enjoy awhile the comfort of the life of the world, then on the Day of Resurrection he will be of those arraigned ?
On the day when He will call unto them and say: Where are My partners whom ye imagined ?
Those concerning whom the Word will have come true will say: Our Lord! These are they whom we led astray. We led them astray even as we ourselves were astray. We declare our innocence before Thee: us they never worshipped.
And it will be said: Cry unto your (so-called) partners (of Allah). And they will cry unto them, and they will give no answer unto them, and they will see the Doom. Ah, if they had but been guided!
And on the Day when He will call unto them and say: What answer gave ye to the messengers ?
On that day (all) tidings will be dimmed for them, nor will they ask one of another,
But as for him who shall repent and believe and do right, he haply may be one of the successful.
Thy Lord bringeth to pass what He willeth and chooseth. They have never any choice. Glorified be Allah and Exalted above all that they associate (with Him)!
And thy Lord knoweth what their breasts conceal, and what they publish.
And He is Allah; there is no God save Him. His is all praise in the former and the latter (state), and His is the command, and unto Him ye will be brought back.
Say: Have ye thought, if Allah made night everlasting for you till the Day of Resurrection, who is a god beside Allah who could bring you light ? Will ye not then hear ?
Say: Have ye thought, if Allah made day everlasting for you till the Day of Resurrection, who is a god beside Allah who could bring you night wherein ye rest ? Will ye not then see ?
Of His mercy hath He appointed for you night and day, that therein ye may rest, and that ye may seek His bounty, and that haply ye may be thankful.
And on the Day when He shall call unto them and say: Where are My partners whom ye pretended ?
And We shall take out from every nation a witness and We shall say: Bring your proof. Then they will know that Allah hath the Truth, and all that they invented will have failed them.
Now Korah was of Moses folk, but he oppressed them; and We gave him so much treasure that the stores thereof would verily have been a burden for a troop of mighty men. When his own folk said unto him: Exult not; lo! Allah loveth not the exultant;
But seek the abode of the Hereafter in that which Allah hath given thee and neglect not thy portion of the world, and be thou kind even as Allah hath been kind to thee, and seek not corruption in the earth; lo! Allah loveth not corrupters,
He said: I have been given it only on account of knowledge I possess. Knew he not that Allah had destroyed already of the generations before him men who were mightier than him in strength and greater in respect of following ? The guilty are not questioned of their sins.
Then went he forth before his people in his pomp. Those who were desirous of the life of the world said: Ah, would that we had the like of what hath been given unto Korah! Lo! he is lord of rare good fortune.
But those who had been given knowledge said: Woe unto you! The reward of Allah for him who believeth and doeth right is better, and only the steadfast will obtain it.
So We caused the earth to swallow him and his dwelling-place. Then he had no host to help him against Allah, nor was he of those who can save themselves.
And morning found those who had coveted his place but yesterday crying: Ah, welladay! Allah enlargeth the provision for whom He will of His slaves and straiteneth it (for whom He will). If Allah had not been gracious unto us He would have caused it to swallow us (also). Ah, welladay! the disbelievers never prosper.
As for that Abode of the Hereafter We assign it unto those who seek not oppression in the earth, nor yet corruption. The sequel is for those who ward off (evil).
Whoso bringeth a good deed, he will have better than the same; while as for him who bringeth an ill-deed, those who do ill-deeds will be requited only what they did.
Lo! He Who hath given thee the Quran for a law will surely bring thee home again. Say: My Lord is Best Aware of him who bringeth guidance and him who is in error manifest.
Thou hadst no hope that the Scripture would be inspired in thee; but it is a mercy from thy Lord, so never be a helper to the disbelievers.
And let them not divert thee from the revelations of Allah after they have been sent down unto thee; but call (mankind) unto thy Lord, and be not of those who ascribe partners (unto Him).
And cry not unto any other god along with Allah. There is no God save Him. Everything will perish save His countenance. His is the command, and unto Him ye will be brought back.
Alif. Lam. Mim.
Do men imagine that they will be left (at ease) because they say, We believe, and will not be tested with affliction ?
Lo! We tested those who were before you. Thus Allah knoweth those who are sincere, and knoweth those who feign.
Or do those who do ill-deeds imagine that they can outstrip Us ? Evil (for them) is that which they decide.
Whoso looketh forward to the meeting with Allah (let him know that) Allahs reckoning is surely nigh, and He is the Hearer, the Knower.
And whosoever striveth, striveth only for himself, for lo! Allah is altogether Independent of (His) creatures.
And as for those who believe and do good works, We shall remit from them their evil deeds and shall repay them the best that they did.
We have enjoined on man kindness to parents; but if they strive to make thee join with Me that of which thou hast no knowledge, then obey them not. Unto Me is your return and I shall tell you what ye used to do.
And as for those who believe and do good works, We verily shall make them enter in among the righteous.
Of mankind is he who saith: We believe in Allah, but, if he be made to suffer for the sake of Allah, he mistaketh the persecution of mankind for Allahs punishment; and then, if victory cometh from thy Lord, will say: Lo! we were with you (all the while). Is not Allah Best Aware of what is in the bosoms of (His) creatures ?
Verily Allah knoweth those who believe, and verily He knoweth the hypocrites.
Those who disbelieve say unto those who believe: Follow our way (of religion) and we verily will bear your sins (for you). They cannot bear aught of their sins. Lo! they verily are liars.
But they verily will bear their own loads and other loads beside their own, and they verily will be questioned on the Day of Resurrection concerning that which they invented.
And verily we sent Noah (as Our messenger) unto his folk, and he continued with them for a thousand years save fifty years; and the flood engulfed them, for they were wrong-doers.
And We rescued him and those with him in the ship, and made of it a portent for the peoples.
And Abraham! (Remember) when he said unto his folk: Serve Allah, and keep your duty unto Him; that is better for you if ye did but know.
Ye serve instead of Allah only idols, and ye only invent a lie. Lo! those whom ye serve instead of Allah own no provision for you. So seek your provision from Allah, and serve Him, and give thanks unto Him, (for) unto Him ye will be brought back.
But if ye deny, then nations have denied before you. The messenger is only to convey (the message) plainly.
See they not how Allah produceth creation, then reproduceth it ? Lo! for Allah that is easy.
Say (O Muhammad): Travel in the land and see how He originated creation, then Allah bringeth forth the later growth. Lo! Allah is Able to do all things.
He punisheth whom He will and showeth mercy unto whom He will, and unto Him ye will be turned.
Ye cannot escape (from Him) in the earth or in the sky, and beside Allah there is for you no friend or helper.
Those who disbelieve in the revelations of Allah and in (their) Meeting with Him, such have no hope of My mercy. For such there is a painful doom.
But the answer of his folk was only that they said: Kill him or Burn him. Then Allah saved him from the Fire. Lo! herein verily are portents for folk who believe.
He said: Ye have chosen only idols instead of Allah. The love between you is only in the life of the world. Then on the Day of Resurrection ye will deny each other and curse each other, and your abode will be the Fire, and ye will have no helpers.
And Lot believed him, and said: Lo! I am a fugitive unto my Lord. Lo! He, only He, is the Mighty, the Wise.
And We bestowed on him Isaac and Jacob, and We established the prophethood and the Scripture among his seed, and We gave him his reward in the world, and lo! in the Hereafter he verily is among the righteous.
And Lot! (Remember) when he said unto his folk: Lo! ye commit lewdness such as no creature did before you.
For come ye not in unto males, and cut ye not the road (for travellers), and commit ye not abomination in your meetings ? But the answer of his folk was only that they said: Bring Allahs doom upon us if thou art a truthteller!
He said: My Lord! Give me victory over folk who work corruption.
And when Our messengers brought Abraham the good news, they said: Lo! we are about to destroy the people of that township, for its people are wrong-doers.
He said: Lo! Lot is there. They said: We are best aware of who is there. We are to deliver him and his household, all save his wife, who is of those who stay behind.
And when Our messengers came unto Lot, he was troubled upon their account, for he could not protect them; but they said: Fear not, nor grieve! Lo! we are to deliver thee and thy household, (all) save thy wife, who is of those who stay behind.
Lo! We are about to bring down upon the folk of this township a fury from the sky because they are evil-livers.
And verily of that We have left a clear sign for people who have sense.
And unto Midian We sent Shueyb, their brother. He said: O my people! Serve Allah, and look forward to the Last Day, and do not evil, making mischief, in the earth.
But they denied him, and the dreadful earthquake took them, and morning found them prostrate in their dwelling place.
And (the tribes of) Aad and Thamud! (Their fate) is manifest unto you from their (ruined and deserted) dwellings. Satan made their deeds seem fair unto them and so debarred them from the Way, though they were keen observers.
And Korah, Pharaoh and Haman! Moses came unto them with clear proofs (of Allahs Sovereignty), but they were boastful in the land. And they were not winners (in the race).
So We took each one in his sin; of them was he on whom We sent a hurricane, and of them was he who was overtaken by the (Awful) Cry, and of them was he whom We caused the earth to swallow, and of them was he whom We drowned. It was not for Allah to wrong them, but they wronged themselves.
The likeness of those who choose other patrons than Allah is as the likeness of the spider when she taketh unto herself a house, and lo! the frailest of all houses is the spiders house, if they but knew.
Lo! Allah knoweth what thing they invoke instead of Him. He is the Mighty, the Wise.
As for these similitudes, We coin them for mankind, but none will grasp their meaning save the wise.
Allah created the heavens and the earth with truth. Lo! therein is indeed a portent for believers.
Recite that which hath been inspired in thee of the Scripture, and establish worship. Lo! worship preserveth from lewdness and iniquity, but verily remembrance of Allah is more important. And Allah knoweth what ye do.
And argue not with the People of the Scripture unless it be in (a way) that is better, save with such of them as do wrong; and say: We believe in that which hath been revealed unto us and revealed unto you; our God and your God is One, and unto Him we surrender.
In like manner We have revealed unto thee the Scripture, and those unto whom We gave the Scripture aforetime will believe therein; and of these (also) there are some who believe therein. And none deny Our revelations save the disbelievers.
And thou (O Muhammad) wast not a reader of any scripture before it, nor didst thou write it with thy right hand, for then might those have doubted, who follow falsehood.
But it is clear revelations in the hearts of those who have been given knowledge, and none deny Our revelations save wrong-doers.
And they say: Why are not portents sent down upon him from his Lord ? Say: Portents are with Allah only, and I am but a plain warner.
Is it not enough for them that We have sent down unto thee the Scripture which is read unto them ? Lo! herein verily is mercy, and a reminder for folk who believe.
Say (unto them, O Muhammad): Allah sufficeth for witness between me and you. He knoweth whatsoever is in the heavens and the earth. And those who believe in vanity and disbelieve in Allah, they it is who are the losers.
They bid thee hasten on the doom (of Allah). And if a term had not been appointed, the doom would assuredly have come unto them (ere now). And verily it will come upon them suddenly when they perceive not.
They bid thee hasten on the doom, when lo! hell verily will encompass the disbelievers
On the day when the doom will overwhelm them from above them and from underneath their feet, and He will say: Taste what ye used to do!
O my bondmen who believe! Lo! My earth is spacious. Therefor serve Me only.
Every soul will taste of death. Then unto Us ye will be returned.
Those who believe and do good works, them verily We shall house in lofty dwellings of the Garden underneath which rivers flow. There they will dwell secure. How sweet the guerdon of the toilers,
Who persevere, and put their trust in their Lord!
And how many an animal there is that beareth not its own provision! Allah provideth for it and for you. He is the Hearer, the Knower.
And if thou wert to ask them: Who created the heavens and the earth, and constrained the sun and the moon (to their appointed work) ? they would say: Allah. How then are they turned away ?
Allah maketh the provision wide for whom He will of His bondmen, and straiteneth it for whom (He will). Lo! Allah is Aware of all things.
And if thou wert to ask them: Who causeth water to come down from the sky, and therewith reviveth the earth after its death ? they verily would say: Allah. Say: Praise be to Allah! But most of them have no sense.
This life of the world is but a pastime and a game. Lo! the home of the Hereafter - that is Life, if they but knew.
And when they mount upon the ships they pray to Allah, making their faith pure for Him only, but when He bringeth them safe to land, behold! they ascribe partners (unto Him),
That they may disbelieve in that which We have given them, and that they may take their ease. But they will come to know.
Have they not seen that We have appointed a sanctuary immune (from violence), while mankind are ravaged all around them ? Do they then believe in falsehood and disbelieve in the bounty of Allah ?
Who doeth greater wrong than he who inventeth a lie concerning Allah, or denieth the truth when it cometh unto him ? Is not there a home in hell for disbelievers ?
As for those who strive in Us, We surely guide them to Our paths, and lo! Allah is with the good.
Alif. Lam. Mim.
The Romans have been defeated
In the nearer land, and they, after their defeat will be victorious
Within ten years - Allahs is the command in the former case and in the latter and in that day believers will rejoice
In Allahs help to victory. He helpeth to victory whom He will. He is the Mighty, the Merciful.
It is a promise of Allah. Allah faileth not His promise, but most of mankind know not.
They know only some appearance of the life of the world, and are heedless of the Hereafter.
Have they not pondered upon themselves ? Allah created not the heavens and the earth, and that which is between them, save with truth and for a destined end. But truly many of mankind are disbelievers in the meeting with their Lord.
Have they not travelled in the land and seen the nature of the consequence for those who were before them ? They were stronger than these in power, and they dug the earth and built upon it more than these have built. Messengers of their own came unto them with clear proofs (of Allahs Sovereignty). Surely Allah wronged them not, but they did wrong themselves.
Then evil was the consequence to those who dealt in evil, because they denied the revelations of Allah and made a mock of them.
Allah produceth creation, then He reproduceth it, then unto Him ye will be returned.
And in the day when the Hour riseth the unrighteous will despair.
There will be none to intercede for them of those whom they made equal with Allah. And they will reject their partners (whom they ascribed unto Him).
In the day when the Hour cometh, in that day they will be sundered.
As for those who believed and did good works, they will be made happy in a Garden.
But as for those who disbelieved and denied Our revelations, and denied the meeting of the Hereafter, such will be brought to doom.
So glory be to Allah when ye enter the night and when ye enter the morning -
Unto Him be praise in the heavens and the earth! - and at the suns decline and in the noonday.
He bringeth forth the living from the dead, and He bringeth forth the dead from the living, and He reviveth the earth after her death. And even so will ye be brought forth.
And of His signs is this: He created you of dust, and behold you human beings, ranging widely!
And of His signs is this: He created for you helpmeets from yourselves that ye might find rest in them, and He ordained between you love and mercy. Lo! herein indeed are portents for folk who reflect.
And of His signs is the creation of the heavens and the earth, and the difference of your languages and colours. Lo! herein indeed are portents for men of knowledge.
And of His signs is your slumber by night and by day, and your seeking of His bounty. Lo! herein indeed are portents for folk who heed.
And of His signs is this: He showeth you the lightning for a fear and for a hope, and sendeth down water from the sky, and thereby quickeneth the earth after her death. Lo! herein indeed are portents for folk who understand.
And of His signs is this: The heavens and the earth stand fast by His command, and afterward, when He calleth you, lo! from the earth ye will emerge.
Unto Him belongeth whosoever is in the heavens and the earth. All are obedient unto Him.
He it is Who produceth creation, then reproduceth it, and it is easier for Him. His is the Sublime Similitude in the heavens and the earth. He is the Mighty, the Wise.
He coineth for you a similitude of yourselves. Have ye, from among those whom your right hands possess, partners in the wealth We have bestowed upon you, equal with you in respect thereof, so that ye fear them as ye fear each other (that ye ascribe unto Us partners out of that which We created) ? Thus We display the revelations for people who have sense.
Nay, but those who do wrong follow their own lusts without knowledge. Who is able to guide him whom Allah hath sent astray ? For such there are no helpers.
So set thy purpose (O Muhammad) for religion as a man by nature upright - the nature (framed) of Allah, in which He hath created man. There is no altering (the laws of) Allahs creation. That is the right religion, but most men know not -
Turning unto Him (only); and be careful of your duty unto Him and establish worship, and be not of those who ascribe partners (unto Him);
Of those who split up their religion and became schismatics, each sect exulting in its tenets.
And when harm toucheth men they cry unto their Lord, turning to Him in repentance; then, when they have tasted of His mercy, behold! some of them attribute partners to their Lord
So as to disbelieve in that which We have given them. (Unto such it is said): Enjoy yourselves awhile, but ye will come to know.
Or have We revealed unto them any warrant which speaketh of that which they associate with Him ?
And when We cause mankind to taste of mercy they rejoice therein; but if an evil thing befall them as the consequence of their own deeds, lo! they are in despair!
See they not that Allah enlargeth the provision for whom He will, and straiteneth (it for whom He will). Lo! herein indeed are portents for folk who believe.
So give to the kinsman his due, and to the needy, and to the wayfarer. That is best for those who seek Allahs Countenance. And such are they who are successful.
That which ye give in usury in order that it may increase on (other) peoples property hath no increase with Allah; but that which ye give in charity, seeking Allahs Countenance, hath increase manifold.
Allah is He Who created you and then sustained you, then causeth you to die, then giveth life to you again. Is there any of your (so-called) partners (of Allah) that doeth aught of that ? Praised and Exalted be He above what they associate (with Him)!
Corruption doth appear on land and sea because of (the evil) which mens hands have done, that He may make them taste a part of that which they have done, in order that they may return.
Say (O Muhammad, to the disbelievers): Travel in the land, and see the nature of the consequence for those who were before you! Most of them were idolaters.
So set thy purpose resolutely for the right religion, before the inevitable day cometh from Allah. On that day mankind will be sundered-
Whoso disbelieveth must (then) bear the consequences of his disbelief, while those who do right make provision for themselves -
That He may reward out of His bounty those who believe and do good works. Lo! He loveth not the disbelievers (in His guidance).
And of His signs is this: He sendeth herald winds to make you taste His mercy, and that the ships may sail at His command, and that ye may seek his favour, and that haply ye may be thankful.
Verily We sent before thee (Muhammad) messengers to their own folk. Then we took vengeance upon those who were guilty (in regard to them). To help believers is ever incumbent upon Us.
Allah is He Who sendeth the winds so that they raise clouds, and spreadeth them along the sky as pleaseth Him, and causeth them to break and thou seest the rain downpouring from within them. And when He maketh it to fall on whom He will of His bondmen, lo! they rejoice;
Though before that, even before it was sent down upon them, they were in despair.
Look, therefore, at the prints of Allahs mercy (in creation): how He quickeneth the earth after her death. Lo! He verily is the Quickener of the Dead, and He is Able to do all things.
And if We sent a wind and they beheld it yellow, they verily would still continue in their disbelief.
For verily thou (Muhammad) canst not make the dead to hear, nor canst thou make the deaf to hear the call when they have turned to flee.
Nor canst thou guide the blind out of their error. Thou canst make none to hear save those who believe in Our revelations so that they surrender (unto Him).
Allah is He Who shaped you out of weakness, then appointed after weakness strength, then, after strength, appointed weakness and grey hair. He createth what He will. He is the Knower, the Mighty.
And on the day when the Hour riseth the guilty will vow that they did tarry but an hour - thus were they ever deceived.
But those to whom knowledge and faith are given will say: The truth is, ye have tarried, by Allahs decree, until the Day of Resurrection. This is the Day of Resurrection, but ye used not to know.
In that day their excuses will not profit those who did injustice, nor will they be allowed to make amends.
Verily We have coined for mankind in this Quran all kinds of similitudes; and indeed if thou camest unto them with a miracle, those who disbelieve would verily exclaim: Ye are but tricksters!
Thus doth Allah seal the hearts of those who know not.
So have patience (O Muhammad)! Allahs promise is the very truth, and let not those who have no certainty make thee impatient.
Alif. Lam. Mim.
These are revelations of the wise Scripture,
A guidance and a mercy for the good,
Those who establish worship and pay the poor-due and have sure faith in the Hereafter.
Such have guidance from their Lord. Such are the successful.
And of mankind is he who payeth for mere pastime of discourse, that he may mislead from Allahs way without knowledge, and maketh it the butt of mockery. For such there is a shameful doom.
And when Our revelations are recited unto him he turneth away in pride as if he heard them not, as if there were a deafness in his ears. So give him tidings of a painful doom.
Lo! those who believe and do good works, for them are the gardens of delight,
Wherein they will abide. It is a promise of Allah in truth. He is the Mighty, the Wise.
He hath created the heavens without supports that ye can see, and hath cast into the earth firm hills, so that it quake not with you; and He hath dispersed therein all kinds of beasts. And We send down water from the sky and We cause (plants) of every goodly kind to grow therein.
This is the Creation of Allah. Now show me that which those (ye worship) beside Him have created. Nay, but the wrong-doers are in error manifest!
And verily We gave Luqman wisdom, saying: Give thanks unto Allah; and whosoever giveth thanks, he giveth thanks for (the good of) his soul. And whosoever refuseth - Lo! Allah is Absolute, Owner of Praise.
And (remember) when Luqman said unto his son, when he was exhorting him: O my dear son! Ascribe no partners unto Allah. Lo! to ascribe partners (unto Him) is a tremendous wrong -
And We have enjoined upon man concerning his partners - His mother beareth him in weakness upon weakness, and his weaning is in two years - Give thanks unto Me and unto thy parents. Unto Me is the journeying.
But if they strive with thee to make thee ascribe unto Me as partner that of which thou hast no knowledge, then obey them not. Consort with them in the world kindly, and follow the path of him who repenteth unto Me. Then unto Me will be your return, and I shall tell you what ye used to do -
O my dear son! Lo! though it be but the weight of a grain of mustard-seed, and though it be in a rock, or in the heavens, or in the earth, Allah will bring it forth. Lo! Allah is Subtile, Aware.
O my dear son! Establish worship and enjoin kindness and forbid iniquity, and persevere whatever may befall thee. Lo! that is of the steadfast heart of things.
Turn not thy cheek in scorn toward folk, nor walk with pertness in the land. Lo! Allah loveth not each braggart boaster.
Be modest in thy bearing and subdue thy voice. Lo! the harshest of all voices is the voice of the ass.
See ye not how Allah hath made serviceable unto you whatsoever is in the skies and whatsoever is in the earth and hath loaded you with His favours both without and within ? Yet of mankind is he who disputeth concerning Allah, without knowledge or guidance or a scripture giving light.
And if it be said unto them: Follow that which Allah hath revealed, they say: Nay, but we follow that wherein we found our fathers. What! Even though the devil were inviting them unto the doom of flame ?
Whosoever surrendereth his purpose to Allah while doing good, he verily hath grasped the firm hand-hold. Unto Allah belongeth the sequel of all things.
And whosoever disbelieveth, let not his disbelief afflict thee (O Muhammad). Unto Us is their return, and We shall tell them what they did. Lo! Allah is Aware of what is in the breasts (of men).
We give them comfort for a little, and then We drive them to a heavy doom.
If thou shouldst ask them: Who created the heavens and the earth ? they would answer: Allah. Say: Praise be to Allah! But most of them know not.
Unto Allah belongeth whatsoever is in the heavens and the earth. Lo! Allah, He is the Absolute, the Owner of Praise.
And if all the trees in the earth were pens, and the sea, with seven more seas to help it, (were ink), the words of Allah could not be exhausted. Lo! Allah is Mighty, Wise.
Your creation and your raising (from the dead) are only as (the creation and the raising of) a single soul. Lo! Allah is Hearer, Knower.
Hast thou not seen how Allah causeth the night to pass into the day and causeth the day to pass into the night, and hath subdued the sun and the moon (to do their work), each running unto an appointed term; and that Allah is Informed of what ye do ?
That (is so) because Allah, He is the True, and that which they invoke beside Him is the False, and because Allah, He is the Sublime, the Great.
Hast thou not seen how the ships glide on the sea by Allahs grace, that He may show you of His wonders ? Lo! therein indeed are portents for every steadfast, grateful (heart).
And if a wave enshroudeth them like awnings, they cry unto Allah, making their faith pure for Him only. But when He bringeth them safe to land, some of them compromise. None denieth Our signs save every traitor ingrate.
O mankind! Keep your duty to your Lord and fear a Day when the parent will not be able to avail the child in aught, nor the child to avail the parent. Lo! Allahs promise is the very truth. Let not the life of the world beguile you, nor let the deceiver beguile you, in regard to Allah.
Lo! Allah! With Him is knowledge of the Hour. He sendeth down the rain, and knoweth that which is in the wombs. No soul knoweth what it will earn to- morrow, and no soul knoweth in what land it will die. Lo! Allah is Knower, Aware.
Alif. Lam. Mim
The revelation of the Scripture whereof there is no doubt is from the Lord of the Worlds.
Or say they: He hath invented it ? Nay, but it is the Truth from thy Lord, that thou mayst warn a folk to whom no warner came before thee, that haply they may walk aright.
Allah it is Who created the heavens and the earth, and that which is between them, in six Days. Then He mounted the Throne. Ye have not, beside Him, a protecting friend or mediator. Will ye not then remember ?
He directeth the ordinance from the heaven unto the earth; then it ascendeth unto Him in a Day, whereof the measure is a thousand years of that ye reckon.
Such is the Knower of the Invisible and the Visible, the Mighty, the Merciful,
Who made all things good which He created, and He began the creation of man from clay;
Then He made his seed from a draught of despised fluid;
Then He fashioned him and breathed into him of His Spirit; and appointed for you hearing and sight and hearts. Small thanks give ye!
And they say: When we are lost in the earth, how can we then be re-created ? Nay but they are disbelievers in the meeting with their Lord.
Say: The angel of death, who hath charge concerning you, will gather you, and afterward unto your Lord ye will be returned.
Couldst thou but see when the guilty hang their heads before their Lord, (and say): Our Lord! We have now seen and heard, so send us back; we will do right, now we are sure.
And if We had so willed, We could have given every soul its guidance, but the word from Me concerning evildoers took effect: that I will fill hell with the jinn and mankind together.
So taste (the evil of your deeds). Forasmuch as ye forgot the meeting of this your day, lo! We forget you. Taste the doom of immortality because of what ye used to do.
Only those believe in Our revelations who, when they are reminded of them, fall down prostrate and hymn the praise of their Lord, and they are not scornful,
Who forsake their beds to cry unto their Lord in fear and hope, and spend of that We have bestowed on them.
No soul knoweth what is kept hid for them of joy, as a reward for what they used to do.
Is he who is a believer like unto him who is an evil-liver ? They are not alike.
But as for those who believe and do good works, for them are the Gardens of Retreat - a welcome (in reward) for what they used to do.
And as for those who do evil, their retreat is the Fire. Whenever they desire to issue forth from thence, they are brought back thither. Unto them it is said: Taste the torment of the Fire which ye used to deny.
And verily We make them taste the lower punishment before the greater, that haply they may return.
And who doth greater wrong than he who is reminded of the revelations of his Lord, then turneth from them. Lo! We shall requite the guilty.
We verily gave Moses the Scripture; so be not ye in doubt of his receiving it; and We appointed it a guidance for the Children of Israel.
And when they became steadfast and believed firmly in Our revelations, We appointed from among them leaders who guided by Our command.
Lo! thy Lord will judge between them on the Day of Resurrection concerning that wherein they used to differ.
Is it not a guidance for them (to observe) how many generations We destroyed before them, amid whose dwelling places they do walk ? Lo! therein verily are portents! Will they not then heed ?
Have they not seen how We lead the water to the barren land and therewith bring forth crops whereof their cattle eat, and they themselves ? Will they not then see ?
And they say: When cometh this victory (of yours) if ye are truthful ?
Say (unto them): On the day of the victory the faith of those who disbelieve (and who then will believe) will not avail them, neither will they be reprieved.
So withdraw from them (O Muhammad), and await (the event). Lo! they (also) are awaiting (it).
O Prophet! Keep thy duty to Allah and obey not the disbelievers and the hypocrites. Lo! Allah is Knower, Wise.
And follow that which is inspired in thee from thy Lord. Lo! Allah is Aware of what ye do.
And put thy trust in Allah, for Allah is sufficient as Trustee.
Allah hath not assigned unto any man two hearts within his body, nor hath He made your wives whom ye declare (to be your mothers) your mothers, nor hath He made those whom ye claim (to be your sons) your sons. This is but a saying of your mouths. But Allah saith the truth and He showeth the way.
Proclaim their real parentage. That will be more equitable in the sight of Allah. And if ye know not their fathers, then (they are) your brethren in the faith, and your clients. And there is no sin for you in the mistakes that ye make unintentionally, but what your hearts purpose (that will be a sin for you). Allah is ever Forgiving, Merciful.
The Prophet is closer to the believers than their selves, and his wives are (as) their mothers. And the owners of kinship are closer one to another in the ordinance of Allah than (other) believers and the fugitives (who fled from Mecca), except that ye should do kindness to your friends. This is written in the Book (of nature).
And when We exacted a covenant from the prophets, and from thee (O Muhammad) and from Noah and Abraham and Moses and Jesus son of Mary. We took from them a solemn covenant;
That He may ask the loyal of their loyalty. And He hath prepared a painful doom for the unfaithful.
O ye who believe! Remember Allahs favour unto you when there came against you hosts, and We sent against them a great wind and hosts ye could not see. And Allah is ever Seer of what ye do.
When they came upon you from above you and from below you, and when eyes grew wild and hearts reached to the throats, and ye were imagining vain thoughts concerning Allah.
There were the believers sorely tried, and shaken with a mighty shock.
And when the hypocrites, and those in whose hearts is a disease, were saying: Allah and His messenger promised us naught but delusion.
And when a party of them said: O folk of Yathrib! There is no stand (possible) for you, therefor turn back. And certain of them (even) sought permission of the Prophet, saying: Our homes lie open (to the enemy). And they lay not open. They but wished to flee.
If the enemy had entered from all sides and they had been exhorted to treachery, they would have committed it, and would have hesitated thereupon but little.
And verily they had already sworn unto Allah that they would not turn their backs (to the foe). An oath to Allah must be answered for.
Say: Flight will not avail you if ye flee from death or killing, and then ye dwell in comfort but a little while.
Say: Who is he who can preserve you from Allah if He intendeth harm for you, or intendeth mercy for you. They will not find that they have any friend or helper other than Allah.
Allah already knoweth those of you who hinder, and those who say unto their brethren: Come ye hither unto us! and they come not to the stress of battle save a little,
Being sparing of their help to you (believers). But when the fear cometh, then thou (Muhammad) seest them regarding thee with rolling eyes like one who fainteth unto death. Then, when the fear departeth, they scald you with sharp tongues in their greed for wealth (from the spoil). Such have not believed. Therefor Allah maketh their deeds fruitless. And that is easy for Allah.
They hold that the clans have not retired (for good); and if the clans should advance (again), they would fain be in the desert with the wandering Arabs, asking for the news of you; and if they were among you, they would not give battle, save a little.
Verily in the messenger of Allah ye have a good example for him who looketh unto Allah and the Last Day, and remembereth Allah much.
And when the true believers saw the clans, they said: This is that which Allah and His messenger promised us. Allah and His messenger are true. It did but confirm them in their faith and resignation.
Of the believers are men who are true to that which they covenanted with Allah. Some of them have paid their vow by death (in battle), and some of them still are waiting; and they have not altered in the least;
That Allah may reward the true men for their truth, and punish the hypocrites if He will, or relent toward them (if He will). Lo! Allah is Forgiving, Merciful.
And Allah repulsed the disbelievers in their wrath; they gained no good. Allah averted their attack from the believers. Allah is ever Strong, Mighty.
And He brought those of the People of the Scripture who supported them down from their strongholds, and cast panic into their hearts. Some ye slew, and ye made captive some.
And He caused you to inherit their land and their houses and their wealth, and land ye have not trodden. Allah is ever Able to do all things.
O Prophet! Say unto thy wives: If ye desire the worlds life and its adornment, come! I will content you and will release you with a fair release.
But if ye desire Allah and His messenger and the abode of the Hereafter, then lo! Allah hath prepared for the good among you an immense reward.
O ye wives of the Prophet! Whosoever of you committeth manifest lewdness, the punishment for her will be doubled, and that is easy for Allah.
And whosoever of you is submissive unto Allah and His messenger and doeth right, We shall give her her reward twice over, and We have prepared for her a rich provision.
O ye wives of the Prophet! Ye are not like any other women. If ye keep your duty (to Allah), then be not soft of speech, lest he in whose heart is a disease aspire (to you), but utter customary speech.
And stay in your houses. Bedizen not yourselves with the bedizenment of the Time of Ignorance. Be regular in prayer, and pay the poor-due, and obey Allah and His messenger. Allahs wish is but to remove uncleanness far from you, O Folk of the Household, and cleanse you with a thorough cleansing.
And bear in mind that which is recited in your houses of the revelations of Allah and wisdom. Lo! Allah is Subtile, Aware.
Lo! men who surrender unto Allah, and women who surrender, and men who believe and women who believe, and men who obey and women who obey, and men who speak the truth and women who speak the truth, and men who persevere (in righteousness) and women who persevere, and men who are humble and women who are humble, and men who give alms and women who give alms, and men who fast and women who fast, and men who guard their modesty and women who guard (their modesty), and men who remember Allah much and women who remember - Allah hath prepared for them forgiveness and a vast reward.
And it becometh not a believing man or a believing woman, when Allah and His messenger have decided an affair (for them), that they should (after that) claim any say in their affair; and whoso is rebellious to Allah and His messenger, he verily goeth astray in error manifest.
And when thou saidst unto him on whom Allah hath conferred favour and thou hast conferred favour: Keep thy wife to thyself, and fear Allah. And thou didst hide in thy mind that which Allah was to bring to light, and thou didst fear mankind whereas Allah hath a better right that thou shouldst fear Him. So when Zeyd had performed that necessary formality (of divorce) from her, We gave her unto thee in marriage, so that (henceforth) there may be no sin for believers in respect of wives of their adopted sons, when the latter have performed the necessary formality (of release) from them. The commandment of Allah must be fulfilled.
There is no reproach for the Prophet in that which Allah maketh his due. That was Allahs way with those who passed away of old - and the commandment of Allah is certain destiny -
Who delivered the messages of Allah and feared Him, and feared none save Allah. Allah keepeth good account.
Muhammad is not the father of any man among you, but he is the messenger of Allah and the Seal of the Prophets; and Allah is ever Aware of all things.
O ye who believe! Remember Allah with much remembrance.
And glorify Him early and late.
He it is Who blesseth you, and His angels (bless you), that He may bring you forth from darkness unto light; and He is ever Merciful to the believers.
Their salutation on the day when they shall meet Him will be: Peace. And He hath prepared for them a goodly recompense.
O Prophet! Lo! We have sent thee as a witness and a bringer of good tidings and a warner.
And as a summoner unto Allah by His permission, and as a lamp that giveth light.
And announce unto the believers the good tidings that they will have great bounty from Allah.
And incline not to the disbelievers and the hypocrites. Disregard their noxious talk, and put thy trust in Allah. Allah is sufficient as Trustee.
O ye who believe! If ye wed believing women and divorce them before ye have touched them, then there is no period that ye should reckon. But content them and release them handsomely.
O Prophet! Lo! We have made lawful unto thee thy wives unto whom thou hast paid their dowries, and those whom thy right hand possesseth of those whom Allah hath given thee as spoils of war, and the daughters of thine uncle on the fathers side and the daughters of thine aunts on the fathers side, and the daughters of thine uncle on the mothers side and the daughters of thine aunts on the mothers side who emigrated with thee, and a believing woman if she give herself unto the Prophet and the Prophet desire to ask her in marriage - a privilege for thee only, not for the (rest of) believers - We are Aware of that which We enjoined upon them concerning their wives and those whom their right hands possess - that thou mayst be free from blame, for Allah is ever Forgiving, Merciful.
Thou canst defer whom thou wilt of them and receive unto thee whom thou wilt, and whomsoever thou desirest of those whom thou hast set aside (temporarily), it is no sin for thee (to receive her again); that is better; that they may be comforted and not grieve, and may all be pleased with what thou givest them. Allah knoweth what is in your hearts (O men), and Allah is ever Forgiving, Clement.
It is not allowed thee to take (other) women henceforth, nor that thou shouldst change them for other wives even though their beauty pleased thee, save those whom thy right hand possesseth. And Allah is ever Watcher over all things.
O Ye who believe! Enter not the dwellings of the Prophet for a meal without waiting for the proper time, unless permission be granted you. But if ye are invited, enter, and, when your meal is ended, then disperse. Linger not for conversation. Lo! that would cause annoyance to the Prophet, and he would be shy of (asking) you (to go); but Allah is not shy of the truth. And when ye ask of them (the wives of the Prophet) anything, ask it of them from behind a curtain. That is purer for your hearts and for their hearts. And it is not for you to cause annoyance to the messenger of Allah, nor that ye should ever marry his wives after him. Lo! that in Allahs sight would be an enormity.
Whether ye divulge a thing or keep it hidden, lo! Allah is ever Knower of all things.
It is no sin for them (thy wives) to converse freely) with their fathers, or their sons, or their brothers, or their brothers sons, or the sons of their sisters or of their own women, or their slaves. O women! Keep your duty to Allah. Lo! Allah is ever Witness over all things.
Lo! Allah and His angels shower blessings on the Prophet. O ye who believe! Ask blessings on him and salute him with a worthy salutation.
Lo! those who malign Allah and His messenger, Allah hath cursed them in the world and the Hereafter, and hath prepared for them the doom of the disdained.
And those who malign believing men and believing women undeservedly, they bear the guilt of slander and manifest sin.
O Prophet! Tell thy wives and thy daughters and the women of the believers to draw their cloaks close round them (when they go abroad). That will be better, so that they may be recognised and not annoyed. Allah is ever Forgiving, Merciful.
If the hypocrites, and those in whose hearts is a disease, and the alarmists in the city do not cease, We verily shall urge thee on against them, then they will be your neighbours in it but a little while.
Accursed, they will be seized wherever found and slain with a (fierce) slaughter.
That was the way of Allah in the case of those who passed away of old; thou wilt not find for the way of Allah aught of power to change.
Men ask thee of the Hour. Say: The knowledge of it is with Allah only. What can convey (the knowledge) unto thee ? It may be that the Hour is nigh.
Lo! Allah hath cursed the disbelievers, and hath prepared for them a flaming fire,
Wherein they will abide for ever. They will find (then) no protecting friend nor helper.
On the day when their faces are turned over in the Fire, they say: Oh, would that we had obeyed Allah and had obeyed His messenger!
And they say: Our Lord! Lo! we obeyed our princes and great men, and they misled us from the Way.
Our Lord! Oh, give them double torment and curse them with a mighty curse.
O ye who believe! Be not as those who slandered Moses, but Allah proved his innocence of that which they alleged, and he was well esteemed in Allahs sight.
O ye who believe! Guard your duty to Allah, and speak words straight to the point;
He will adjust your works for you and will forgive you your sins. Whosoever obeyeth Allah and His messenger, he verily hath gained a signal victory.
Lo! We offered the trust unto the heavens and the earth and the hills, but they shrank from bearing it and were afraid of it. And man assumed it. Lo! he hath proved a tyrant and a fool.
So Allah punisheth hypocritical men and hypocritical women, and idolatrous men and idolatrous women. But Allah pardoneth believing men and believing women, and Allah is ever Forgiving, Merciful.
Praise be to Allah, unto Whom belongeth whatsoever is in the heavens and whatsoever is in the earth. His is the praise in the Hereafter, and He is the Wise, the Aware.
He knoweth that which goeth into the earth and that which cometh forth from it, and that descendeth from the heaven and that which ascendeth into it. He is the Merciful, the Forgiving.
Those who disbelieve say: The Hour will never come unto us. Say: Nay, by my Lord, but it is coming unto you surely. (He is) the Knower of the Unseen. Not an atoms weight, or less than that or greater, escapeth Him in the heavens or in the earth, but it is in a clear Record,
That He may reward those who believe and do good works. For them is pardon and a rich provision.
But those who strive against Our revelations, challenging (Us), theirs will be a painful doom of wrath.
Those who have been given knowledge see that what is revealed unto thee from thy Lord is the truth and leadeth unto the path of the Mighty, the Owner of Praise.
Those who disbelieve say: Shall we show you a man who will tell you (that) when ye have become dispersed in dust with most complete dispersal still, even then, ye will be created anew ?
Hath he invented a lie concerning Allah, or is there in him a madness ? Nay, but those who disbelieve in the Hereafter are in torment and far error.
Have they not observed what is before them and what is behind them of the sky and the earth ? If We will, We can make the earth swallow them, or cause obliteration from the sky to fall on them. Lo! herein surely is a portent for every slave who turneth (to Allah) repentant.
And assuredly We gave David grace from Us, (saying): O ye hills and birds, echo his psalms of praise! And We made the iron supple unto him,
Saying: Make thou long coats of mail and measure the links (thereof). And do ye right. Lo! I am Seer of what ye do.
And unto Solomon (We gave) the wind, whereof the morning course was a months journey and the evening course a months journey, and We caused the fount of copper to gush forth for him, and (We gave him) certain of the jinn who worked before him by permission of his Lord. And such of them as deviated from Our command, them We caused to taste the punishment of flaming Fire.
They made for him what he willed: synagogues and statues, basins like wells and boilers built into the ground. Give thanks, O House of David! Few of My bondmen are thankful.
And when We decreed death for him, nothing showed his death to them save a creeping creature of the earth which gnawed away his staff. And when he fell the jinn saw clearly how, if they had known the Unseen, they would not have continued in despised toil.
There was indeed a sign for Sheba in their dwelling-place: Two gardens on the right hand and the left (as who should say): Eat of the provision of your Lord and render thanks to Him. A fair land and an indulgent Lord!
But they were froward, so We sent on them the flood of Iram, and in exchange for their two gardens gave them two gardens bearing bitter fruit, the tamarisk and here and there a lote-tree.
This We awarded them because of their ingratitude. Punish We ever any save the ingrates ?
And We set, between them and the towns which We had blessed, towns easy to be seen, and We made the stage between them easy, (saying): Travel in them safely both by night and day.
But they said: Our Lord! Make the stage between our journeys longer. And they wronged themselves, therefore We made them bywords (in the land) and scattered them abroad, a total scattering. Lo! herein verily are portents for each steadfast, grateful (heart).
And Satan indeed found his calculation true concerning them, for they follow him, all save a group of true believers.
And he had no warrant whatsoever against them, save that We would know him who believeth in the Hereafter from him who is in doubt thereof; and thy Lord (O Muhammad) taketh note of all things.
Say (O Muhammad): Call upon those whom ye set up beside Allah! They possess not an atoms weight either in the heavens or in the earth, nor have they any share in either, nor hath He an auxiliary among them.
No intercession availeth with Him save for him whom He permitteth. Yet, when fear is banished from their hearts, they say: What was it that your Lord said ? They say: The Truth. And He is the Sublime, the Great.
Say: Who giveth you provision from the sky and the earth ? Say: Allah, Lo! we or you assuredly are rightly guided or in error manifest.
Say: Ye will not be asked of what we committed, nor shall we be asked of what ye do.
Say: Our Lord will bring us all together, then He will judge between us with truth. He is the All-knowing Judge.
Say: Show me those whom ye have joined unto Him as partners. Nay (ye dare not)! For He is Allah, the Mighty, the Wise.
And We have not sent thee (O Muhammad) save as a bringer of good tidings and a warner unto all mankind; but most of mankind know not.
And they say: When is this promise (to be fulfilled) if ye are truthful ?
Say (O Muhammad): Yours is the promise of a Day which ye cannot postpone nor hasten by an hour.
And those who disbelieve say: We believe not in this Quran nor in that which was before it; but oh, if thou couldst see, when the wrong-doers are brought up before their Lord, how they cast the blame one to another; how those who were despised (in the earth) say unto those who were proud: But for you, we should have been believers.
Those who were proud say unto those who were despised: Did we drive you away from the guidance after it had come unto you ? Nay, but ye were guilty.
Those who were despised say unto those who were proud: Nay but (it was your) scheming night and day, when ye commanded us to disbelieve in Allah and set up rivals unto Him. And they are filled with remorse when they behold the doom; and We place carcans on the necks of those who disbelieved. Are they requited aught save what they used to do ?
And We sent not unto any township a warner, but its pampered ones declared: Lo! we are disbelievers in that wherewith ye have been sent.
And they say: We are more (than you) in wealth and children. We are not the punished!
Say (O Muhammad): Lo! my Lord enlargeth the provision for whom He will and narroweth it (for whom He will). But most of mankind know not.
And it is not your wealth nor your children that will bring you near unto Us, but he who believeth and doeth good (he draweth near). As for such, theirs will be twofold reward for what they did and they will dwell secure in lofty halls.
And as for those who strive against Our revelations, challenging, they will be brought to the doom.
Say: Lo! my Lord enlargeth the provision for whom He will of His bondmen, and narroweth (it) for him. And whatsoever ye spend (for good) He replaceth it. And He is the Best of Providers.
And on the day when He will gather them all together, He will say unto the angels: Did these worship you ?
They will say: Be Thou Glorified. Thou (alone) art our Guardian, not them! Nay, but they worshipped the jinn; most of them were believers in them.
That day ye will possess no use nor hurt one for another. And We shall say unto those who did wrong: Taste the doom of the Fire which ye used to deny.
And if Our revelations are recited unto them in plain terms, they say: This is naught else than a man who would turn you away from what your fathers used to worship; and they say: This is naught else than an invented lie. Those who disbelieve say of the truth when it reacheth them: This is naught else than mere magic.
And We have given them no scriptures which they study, nor sent We unto them, before thee, any warner.
Those before them denied, and these have not attained a tithe of that which We bestowed on them (of old); yet they denied My messengers. How intense then was My abhorrence (of them)!
Say (unto them, O Muhammad): I exhort you unto one thing only: that ye awake, for Allahs sake, by twos and singly, and then reflect: There is no madness in your comrade. He is naught else than a warner unto you in face of a terrific doom.
Say: Whatever reward I might have asked of you is yours. My reward is the affair of Allah only. He is Witness over all things.
Say: Lo! my Lord hurleth the truth. (He is) the Knower of Things Hidden.
Say: The Truth hath come, and falsehood showeth not its face and will not return.
Say: If I err, I err only to my own loss, and if I am rightly guided it is because of that which my Lord hath revealed unto me. Lo! He is Hearer, Nigh.
Couldst thou but see when they are terrified with no escape, and are seized from near at hand,
And say: We (now) believe therein. But how can they reach (faith) from afar off,
When they disbelieved in it of yore. They aim at the unseen from afar off.
And a gulf is set between them and that which they desire, as was done for people of their kind of old. Lo! they were in hopeless doubt.
Praise be to Allah, the Creator of the heavens and the earth, Who appointeth the angels messengers having wings two, three and four. He multiplieth in creation what He will. Lo! Allah is Able to do all things.
That which Allah openeth unto mankind of mercy none can withhold it; and that which He withholdeth none can release thereafter. He is the Mighty, the Wise.
O mankind! Remember Allahs grace toward you! Is there any creator other than Allah who provideth for you from the sky and the earth ? There is no God save Him. Whither then are ye turned ?
And if they deny thee, (O Muhammad), messengers (of Allah) were denied before thee. Unto Allah all things are brought back.
O mankind! Lo! the promise of Allah is true. So let not the life of the world beguile you, and let not the (avowed) beguiler beguile you with regard to Allah.
Lo! the devil is an enemy for you, so treat him as an enemy. He only summoneth his faction to be owners of the flaming Fire.
Those who disbelieve, theirs will be an awful doom; and those who believe and do good works, theirs will be forgiveness and a great reward.
Is he, the evil of whose deeds is made fairseeming unto him so that he deemeth it good, (other than Satans dupe) ? Allah verily sendeth whom He will astray, and guideth whom He will; so let not thy soul expire in sighings for them. Lo! Allah is Aware of what they do!
And Allah it is Who sendeth the winds and they raise a cloud; then We lead it unto a dead land and revive therewith the earth after its death. Such is the Resurrection.
Whoso desireth power (should know that) all power belongeth to Allah. Unto Him good words ascend, and the pious deed doth He exalt; but those who plot iniquities, theirs will be an awful doom; and the plotting of such (folk) will come to naught.
Allah created you from dust, then from a little fluid, then He made you pairs (the male and female). No female beareth or bringeth forth save with His knowledge. And no-one groweth old who groweth old, nor is aught lessened of his life, but it is recorded in a Book, Lo! that is easy for Allah.
And the two seas are not alike: this, fresh, sweet, good to drink, this (other) bitter, salt. And from them both ye eat fresh meat and derive the ornament that ye wear. And thou seest the ship cleaving them with its prow that ye may seek of His bounty, and that haply ye may give thanks.
He maketh the night to pass into the day and He maketh the day to pass into the night. He hath subdued the sun and moon to service. Each runneth unto an appointed term. Such is Allah, your Lord; His is the Sovereignty; and those unto whom ye pray instead of Him own not so much as the white spot on a date-stone.
If ye pray unto them they hear not your prayer, and if they heard they could not grant it you. On the Day of Resurrection they will disown association with you. None can inform you like Him Who is Aware.
O mankind! Ye are the poor in your relation to Allah. And Allah! He is the Absolute, the Owner of Praise.
If He will, He can be rid of you and bring (instead of you) some new creation.
That is not a hard thing for Allah.
And no burdened soul can bear anothers burden, and if one heavy laden crieth for (help with) his load, naught of it will be lifted even though he (unto whom he crieth) be of kin. Thou warnest only those who fear their Lord in secret, and have established worship. He who groweth (in goodness), groweth only for himself, (he cannot by his merit redeem others). Unto Allah is the journeying.
The blind man is not equal with the seer;
Nor is darkness (tantamount to) light;
Nor is the shadow equal with the suns full heat;
Nor are the living equal with the dead. Lo! Allah maketh whom He will to hear. Thou canst not reach those who are in the graves.
Thou art but a warner.
Lo! We have sent thee with the Truth, a bearer of glad tidings and a warner; and there is not a nation but a warner hath passed among them.
And if they deny thee, those before them also denied. Their messengers came unto them with clear proofs (of Allahs Sovereignty), and with the Psalms and the Scripture giving light.
Then seized I those who disbelieved, and how intense was My abhorrence!
Hast thou not seen that Allah causeth water to fall from the sky, and We produce therewith fruit of divers hues; and among the hills are streaks white and red, of divers hues, and (others) raven-black;
And of men and beasts and cattle, in like manner, divers hues ? The erudite among His bondmen fear Allah alone. Lo! Allah is Mighty, Forgiving.
Lo! those who read the Scripture of Allah, and establish worship, and spend of that which We have bestowed on them secretly and openly, they look forward to imperishable gain,
That He will pay them their wages and increase them of His grace. Lo! He is Forgiving, Responsive.
As for that which We inspire in thee of the Scripture, it is the Truth confirming that which was (revealed) before it. Lo! Allah is indeed Observer, Seer of His slaves.
Then We gave the Scripture as inheritance unto those whom We elected of Our bondmen. But of them are some who wrong themselves and of them are some who are lukewarm, and of them are some who outstrip (others) through good deeds, by Allahs leave. That is the great favour!
Gardens of Eden! They enter them wearing armlets of gold and pearl and their raiment therein is silk.
And they say: Praise be to Allah Who hath put grief away from us. Lo! Our Lord is Forgiving, Bountiful,
Who, of His grace, hath installed us in the mansion of eternity, where toil toucheth us not nor can weariness affect us.
But as for those who disbelieve, for them is fire of hell; it taketh not complete effect upon them so that they can die, nor is its torment lightened for them. Thus We punish every ingrate.
And they cry for help there, (saying): Our Lord! Release us; we will do right, not (the wrong) that we used to do. Did not We grant you a life long enough for him who reflected to reflect therein ? And the warner came unto you. Now taste (the flavour of your deeds), for evil-doers have no helper.
Lo! Allah is the Knower of the Unseen of the heavens and the earth. Lo! He is Aware of the secret of (mens) breasts.
He it is Who hath made you regents in the earth; so he who disbelieveth, his disbelief be on his own head. Their disbelief increaseth for the disbelievers, in their Lords sight, naught save abhorrence. Their disbelief increaseth for the disbelievers naught save loss.
Say: Have ye seen your partner-gods to whom ye pray beside Allah ? Show me what they created of the earth! Or have they any portion in the heavens ? Or have We given them a scripture so they act on clear proof therefrom ? Nay, the evil-doers promise one another only to deceive.
Lo! Allah graspeth the heavens and the earth that they deviate not, and if they were to deviate there is not one that could grasp them after Him. Lo! He is ever Clement, Forgiving.
And they swore by Allah, their most binding oath, that if a warner came unto them they would be more tractable than any of the nations; yet, when a warner came unto them it aroused in them naught save repugnance,
(Shown in their) behaving arrogantly in the land and plotting evil; and the evil plot encloseth but the men who make it. Then, can they expect aught save the treatment of the folk of old ? Thou wilt not find for Allahs way of treatment any substitute, nor wilt thou find for Allahs way of treatment aught of power to change.
Have they not travelled in the land and seen the nature of the consequence for those who were before them, and they were mightier than these in power ? Allah is not such that aught in the heavens or in the earth escapeth Him. Lo! He is the Wise, the Mighty.
If Allah took mankind to task by that which they deserve, He would not leave a living creature on the surface of the earth; but He reprieveth them unto an appointed term, and when their term cometh - then verily (they will know that) Allah is ever Seer of His slaves.
Ya Sin.
By the wise Quran,
Lo! thou art of those sent
On a straight path,
A revelation of the Mighty, the Merciful,
That thou mayst warn a folk whose fathers were not warned, so they are heedless.
Already hath the judgment, (for their infidelity) proved true of most of them, for they believe not.
Lo! We have put on their necks carcans reaching unto the chins, so that they are made stiff-necked.
And We have set a bar before them and a bar behind them, and (thus) have covered them so that they see not.
Whether thou warn them or thou warn them not, it is alike for them, for they believe not.
Thou warnest only him who followeth the Reminder and feareth the Beneficent in secret. To him bear tidings of forgiveness and a rich reward.
Lo! We it is Who bring the dead to life. We record that which they send before (them, and their footprints. And all things We have kept in a clear Register.
Coin for them a similitude: The people of the city when those sent (from Allah) came unto them;
When We sent unto them twain, and they denied them both, so We reinforced them with a third, and they said: Lo! we have been sent unto you.
They said: Ye are but mortals like unto us. The Beneficent hath naught revealed. Ye do but lie!
They answered: Our Lord knoweth that we are indeed sent unto you,
And our duty is but plain conveyance (of the message).
(The people of the city) said: We augur ill of you. If ye desist not, we shall surely stone you, and grievous torture will befall you at our hands.
They said: Your evil augury be with you! Is it because ye are reminded (of the truth) ? Nay, but ye are froward folk!
And there came from the uttermost part of the city a man running. He cried: O my people! Follow those who have been sent!
Follow those who ask of you no fee, and who are rightly guided.
For what cause should I not serve Him Who hath created me, and unto Whom ye will be brought back ?
Shall I take (other) gods in place of Him when, if the Beneficent should wish me any harm, their intercession will avail me naught, nor can they save ?
Then truly I should be in error manifest.
Lo! I have believed in your Lord, so hear me!
It was said (unto him): Enter paradise. He said: Would that my people knew
With what (munificence) my Lord hath pardoned me and made me of the honoured ones!
We sent not down against his people after him a host from heaven, nor do We ever send.
It was but one Shout, and lo! they were extinct.
Ah, the anguish for the bondmen! Never came there unto them a messenger but they did mock him!
Have they not seen how many generations We destroyed before them, which indeed returned not unto them;
But all, without exception, will be brought before Us.
A token unto them is the dead earth. We revive it, and We bring forth from it grain so that they eat thereof;
And We have placed therein gardens of the date-palm and grapes, and We have caused springs of water to gush forth therein,
That they may eat of the fruit thereof, and their hands made it not. Will they not, then, give thanks ?
Glory be to Him Who created all the sexual pairs, of that which the earth groweth, and of themselves, and of that which they know not!
A token unto them is night. We strip it of the day, and lo! they are in darkness.
And the sun runneth on unto a resting-place for him. That is the measuring of the Mighty, the Wise.
And for the moon We have appointed mansions till she return like an old shrivelled palm-leaf.
It is not for the sun to overtake the moon, nor doth the night outstrip the day. They float each in an orbit.
And a token unto them is that We bear their offspring in the laden ship,
And have created for them of the like thereof whereon they ride.
And if We will, We drown them, and there is no help for them, neither can they be saved;
Unless by mercy from Us and as comfort for a while.
When it is said unto them: Beware of that which is before you and that which is behind you, that haply ye may find mercy (they are heedless).
Never came a token of the tokens of their Lord to them, but they did turn away from it!
And when it is said unto them: Spend of that wherewith Allah hath provided you, those who disbelieve say unto those who believe: Shall we feed those whom Allah, if He willed, would feed ? Ye are in naught else than error manifest.
And they say: When will this promise be fulfilled, if ye are truthful ?
They await but one Shout, which will surprise them while they are disputing.
Then they cannot make bequest, nor can they return to their own folk.
And the trumpet is blown and lo! from the graves they hie unto their Lord,
Crying: Woe upon us! Who hath raised us from our place of sleep ? This is that which the Beneficent did promise, and the messengers spoke truth.
It is but one Shout, and behold them brought together before Us!
This day no soul is wronged in aught; nor are ye requited aught save what ye used to do.
Lo! those who merit paradise this day are happily employed,
They and their wives, in pleasant shade, on thrones reclining;
Theirs the fruit (of their good deeds) and theirs (all) that they ask;
The word from a Merciful Lord (for them) is: Peace!
But avaunt ye, O ye guilty, this day!
Did I not charge you, O ye sons of Adam, that ye worship not the devil - Lo! he is your open foe! -
But that ye worship Me ? That was the right path.
Yet he hath led astray of you a great multitude. Had ye then no sense ?
This is hell which ye were promised (if ye followed him).
Burn therein this day for that ye disbelieved.
This day We seal up their mouths, and their hands speak out to Us and their feet bear witness as to what they used to earn.
And had We willed, We verily could have quenched their eyesight so that they should struggle for the way. Then how could they have seen ?
And had We willed, We verily could have fixed them in their place, making them powerless to go forward or turn back.
He whom we bring unto old age, We reverse him in creation (making him go back to weakness after strength). Have ye then no sense ?
And We have not taught him (Muhammad) poetry, nor is it meet for him. This is naught else than a Reminder and a Lecture making plain,
To warn whosoever liveth, and that the word may be fulfilled against the disbelievers.
Have they not seen how We have created for them of Our handiwork the cattle, so that they are their owners,
And have subdued them unto them, so that some of them they have for riding, some for food ?
Benefits and (divers) drinks have they from them. Will they not then give thanks ?
And they have taken (other) gods beside Allah, in order that they may be helped.
It is not in their power to help them; but they (the worshippers) are unto them a host in arms.
So let not their speech grieve thee (O Muhammad). Lo! We know what they conceal and what proclaim.
Hath not man seen that We have created him from a drop of seed ? Yet lo! he is an open opponent.
And he hath coined for Us a similitude, and hath forgotten the fact of his creation, saying: Who will revive these bones when they have rotted away ?
Say: He will revive them Who produced them at the first, for He is Knower of every creation,
Who hath appointed for you fire from the green tree, and behold! ye kindle from it.
Is not He Who created the heavens and the earth Able to create the like of them ? Aye, that He is! for He is the All-Wise Creator,
But His command, when He intendeth a thing, is only that He saith unto it: Be! and it is.
Therefor Glory be to Him in Whose hand is the dominion over all things! Unto Him ye will be brought back.
By those who set the ranks in battle order
And those who drive away (the wicked) with reproof
And those who read (the Word) for a reminder,
Lo! thy Lord is surely One;
Lord of the heavens and of the earth and all that is between them, and Lord of the suns risings.
Lo! We have adorned the lowest heaven with an ornament, the planets;
With security from every froward devil.
They cannot listen to the Highest Chiefs for they are pelted from every side,
Outcast, and theirs is a perpetual torment;
Save him who snatcheth a fragment, and there pursueth him a piercing flame.
Then ask them (O Muhammad): Are they stronger as a creation, or those (others) whom we have created ? Lo! We created them of plastic clay.
Nay, but thou dost marvel when they mock
And heed not when they are reminded,
And seek to scoff when they behold a portent.
And they say: Lo! this is mere magic;
When we are dead and have become dust and bones, shall we then, forsooth, be raised (again) ?
And our forefathers ?
Say (O Muhammad): Ye, in truth; and ye will be brought low.
There is but one Shout, and lo! they behold,
And say: Ah, woe for us! This is the Day of Judgment.
This is the Day of Separation, which ye used to deny.
(And it is said unto the angels): Assemble those who did wrong, together with their wives and what they used to worship
Instead of Allah, and lead them to the path to hell;
And stop them, for they must be questioned.
What aileth you that ye help not one another ?
Nay, but this day they make full submission.
And some of them draw near unto others, mutually questioning.
They say: Lo! ye used to come unto us, imposing, (swearing that ye spoke the truth).
They answer: Nay, but ye (yourselves) were not believers.
We had no power over you, but ye were wayward folk.
Now the Word of our Lord hath been fulfilled concerning us. Lo! we are about to taste (the doom).
Thus we misled you. Lo! we were (ourselves) astray.
Then lo! this day they (both) are sharers in the doom.
Lo! thus deal We with the guilty.
For when it was said unto them, There is no God save Allah, they were scornful
And said: Shall we forsake our gods for a mad poet ?
Nay, but he brought the Truth, and he confirmed those sent (before him).
Lo! (now) verily ye taste the painful doom -
Ye are requited naught save what ye did -
Save single-minded slaves of Allah;
For them there is a known provision,
Fruits. And they will be honoured
In the Gardens of delight,
On couches facing one another;
A cup from a gushing spring is brought round for them,
White, delicious to the drinkers,
Wherein there is no headache nor are they made mad thereby.
And with them are those of modest gaze, with lovely eyes,
(Pure) as they were hidden eggs (of the ostrich).
And some of them draw near unto others, mutually questioning.
A speaker of them saith: Lo! I had a comrade
Who used to say: Art thou in truth of those who put faith (in his words) ?
Can we, when we are dead and have become mere dust and bones - can we (then) verily be brought to book ?
He saith: Will ye look ?
Then looketh he and seeth him in the depth of hell.
He saith: By Allah, thou verily didst all but cause my ruin,
And had it not been for the favour of my Lord, I too had been of those haled forth (to doom).
Are we then not to die
Saving our former death, and are we not to be punished ?
Lo! this is the supreme triumph.
For the like of this, then, let the workers work.
Is this better as a welcome, or the tree of Zaqqum ?
Lo! We have appointed it a torment for wrong-doers.
Lo! it is a tree that springeth in the heart of hell.
Its crop is as it were the heads of devils
And lo! they verily must eat thereof, and fill (their) bellies therewith.
And afterward, lo! thereupon they have a drink of boiling water
And afterward, lo! their return is surely unto hell.
They indeed found their fathers astray,
But they make haste (to follow) in their footsteps.
And verily most of the men of old went astray before them,
And verily We sent among them warners.
Then see the nature of the consequence for those warned,
Save single-minded slaves of Allah.
And Noah verily prayed unto Us, and gracious was the Hearer of his prayer
And We saved him and his household from the great distress,
And made his seed the survivors,
And left for him among the later folk (the salutation):
Peace be unto Noah among the peoples!
Lo! thus do We reward the good.
Lo! he is one of Our believing slaves.
Then We did drown the others.
And lo! of his persuasion verily was Abraham
When he came unto his Lord with a whole heart;
When he said unto his father and his folk: What is it that ye worship ?
Is it a falsehood - gods beside Allah - that ye desire ?
What then is your opinion of the Lord of the Worlds ?
And he glanced a glance at the stars
Then said: Lo! I feel sick!
And they turned their backs and went away from him.
Then turned he to their gods and said: Will ye not eat ?
What aileth you that ye speak not ?
Then he attacked them, striking with his right hand.
And (his people) came toward him, hastening.
He said: Worship ye that which ye yourselves do carve
When Allah hath created you and what ye make ?
They said: Build for him a building and fling him in the red-hotfire.
And they designed a snare for him, but We made them the undermost.
And he said: Lo! I am going unto my Lord Who will guide me.
My Lord! Vouchsafe me of the righteous.
So We gave him tidings of a gentle son.
And when (his son) was old enough to walk with him, (Abraham) said: O my dear son, I have seen in a dream that I must sacrifice thee. So look, what thinkest thou ? He said: O my father! Do that which thou art commanded. Allah willing, thou shalt find me of the steadfast.
Then, when they had both surrendered (to Allah), and he had flung him down upon his face,
We called unto him: O Abraham!
Thou hast already fulfilled the vision. Lo! thus do We reward the good.
Lo! that verily was a clear test.
Then We ransomed him with a tremendous victim.
And We left for him among the later folk (the salutation):
Peace be unto Abraham!
Thus do We reward the good.
Lo! he is one of Our believing slaves.
And we gave him tidings of the birth of Isaac, a prophet of the righteous.
And We blessed him and Isaac. And of their seed are some who do good, and some who plainly wrong themselves.
And We verily gave grace unto Moses and Aaron,
And saved them and their people from the great distress,
And helped them so that they became the victors.
And We gave them the clear Scripture
And showed them the right path.
And We left for them among the later folk (the salutation):
Peace be unto Moses and Aaron!
Lo! thus do We reward the good.
Lo! they are two of Our believing slaves.
And lo! Elias was of those sent (to warn),
When he said unto his folk: Will ye not ward off (evil) ?
Will ye cry unto Baal and forsake the Best of creators,
Allah, your Lord and Lord of your forefathers ?
But they denied him, so they surely will be haled forth (to the doom)
Save single-minded slaves of Allah.
And we left for him among the later folk (the salutation):
Peace be unto Elias!
Lo! thus do We reward the good.
Lo! he is one of our believing slaves.
And lo! Lot verily was of those sent (to warn).
When We saved him and his household, every one,
Save an old woman among those who stayed behind;
Then We destroyed the others.
And lo! ye verily pass by (the ruin of) them in the morning
And at night-time; have ye then no sense ?
And lo! Jonah verily was of those sent (to warn)
When he fled unto the laden ship,
And then drew lots and was of those rejected;
And the fish swallowed him while he was blameworthy;
And had he not been one of those who glorify (Allah)
He would have tarried in its belly till the day when they are raised;
Then We cast him on a desert shore while he was sick;
And We caused a tree of gourd to grow above him;
And We sent him to a hundred thousand (folk) or more
And they believed, therefor We gave them comfort for a while.
Now ask them (O Muhammad): Hath thy Lord daughters whereas they have sons ?
Or created We the angels females while they were present ?
Lo! it is of their falsehood that they say:
Allah hath begotten. Allah! verily they tell a lie.
(And again of their falsehood): He hath preferred daughters to sons.
What aileth you ? How judge ye ?
Will ye not then reflect ?
Or have ye a clear warrant ?
Then produce your writ, if ye are truthful.
And they imagine kinship between him and the jinn, whereas the jinn know well that they will be brought before (Him).
Glorified be Allah from that which they attribute (unto Him),
Save single-minded slaves of Allah.
Lo! verily, ye and that which ye worship,
Ye cannot excite (anyone) against Him.
Save him who is to burn in hell.
There is not one of us but hath his known position.
Lo! we, even we are they who set the ranks,
Lo! we, even we are they who hymn His praise
And indeed they used to say:
If we had but a reminder from the men of old
We would be single-minded slaves of Allah.
Yet (now that it is come) they disbelieve therein; but they will come to know.
And verily Our word went forth of old unto Our bondmen sent (to warn)
That they verily would be helped,
And that Our host, they verily would be the victors.
So withdraw from them (O Muhammad) awhile,
And watch, for they will (soon) see.
Would they hasten on Our doom ?
But when it cometh home to them, then it will be a hapless morn for those who have been warned.
Withdraw from them awhile
And watch, for they will (soon) see.
Glorified be thy Lord, the Lord of Majesty, from that which they attribute (unto Him)
And peace be unto those sent (to warn).
And praise be to Allah, Lord of the Worlds!
Sad. By the renowned Quran,
Nay, but those who disbelieve are in false pride and schism.
How many a generation We destroyed before them, and they cried out when it was no longer the time for escape!
And they marvel that a warner from among themselves hath come unto them, and the disbelievers say: This is a wizard, a charlatan.
Maketh he the gods One God ? Lo! that is an astounding thing.
The chiefs among them go about, exhorting: Go and be staunch to your gods! Lo! this is a thing designed.
We have not heard of this in later religion. This is naught but an invention.
Hath the reminder been unto him (alone) among us ? Nay, but they are in doubt concerning My reminder; nay but they have not yet tasted My doom.
Or are theirs the treasures of the mercy of thy Lord, the Mighty, the Bestower ?
Or is the kingdom of the heavens and the earth and all that is between them theirs ? Then let them ascend by ropes!
A defeated host are (all) the factions that are there.
The folk of Noah before them denied (their messenger) and (so did the tribe of) Aad, and Pharaoh firmly planted,
And (the tribe of) Thamud, and the folk of Lot, and the dwellers in the wood: these were the factions.
Not one of them but did deny the messengers, therefor My doom was justified,
These wait for but one Shout, there will be no second thereto.
They say: Our Lord! Hasten on for us our fate before the Day of Reckoning.
Bear with what they say, and remember Our bondman David, lord of might, Lo! he was ever turning in repentance (toward Allah).
Lo! We subdued the hills to hymn the praises (of their Lord) with him at nightfall and sunrise,
And the birds assembled; all were turning unto Him.
We made his kingdom strong and gave him wisdom and decisive speech.
And hath the story of the litigants come unto thee ? How they climbed the wall into the royal chamber;
How they burst in upon David, and he was afraid of them. They said: Be not afraid! (We are) two litigants, one of whom hath wronged the other, therefor judge aright between us; be not unjust; and show us the fair way.
Lo! this my brother hath ninety and nine ewes while I had one ewe; and he said: Entrust it to me, and he conquered me in speech.
(David) said: He hath wronged thee in demanding thine ewe in addition to his ewes, and lo! many partners oppress one another, save such as believe and do good works, and they are few. And David guessed that We had tried him, and he sought forgiveness of his Lord, and he bowed himself and fell down prostrate and repented.
So We forgave him that; and lo! he had access to Our presence and a happy journeys end.
(And it was said unto him): O David! Lo! We have set thee as a viceroy in the earth; therefor judge aright between mankind, and follow not desire that it beguile thee from the way of Allah. Lo! those who wander from the way of Allah have an awful doom, forasmuch as they forgot the Day of Reckoning.
And We created not the heaven and the earth and all that is between them in vain. That is the opinion of those who disbelieve. And woe unto those who disbelieve, from the Fire!
Shall We treat those who believe and do good works as those who spread corruption in the earth; or shall We treat the pious as the wicked ?
(This is) a Scripture that We have revealed unto thee, full of blessing, that they may ponder its revelations, and that men of understanding may reflect.
And We bestowed on David, Solomon. How excellent a slave! Lo! he was ever turning in repentance (toward Allah).
When there were shown to him at eventide lightfooted coursers
And he said: Lo! I have preferred the good things (of the world) to the remembrance of my Lord; till they were taken out of sight behind the curtain.
(Then he said): Bring them back to me, and fell to slashing (with his sword their) legs and necks.
And verily We tried Solomon, and set upon his throne a (mere) body. Then did he repent.
He said: My Lord! Forgive me and bestow on me sovereignty such as shall not belong to any after me. Lo! Thou art the Bestower.
So We made the wind subservient unto him, setting fair by his command whithersoever he intended.
And the unruly, every builder and diver (made We subservient),
And others linked together in chains,
(Saying): This is Our gift, so bestow thou, or withhold, without reckoning.
And lo! he hath favour with Us, and a happy journeys end.
And make mention (O Muhammad) of Our bondman Job, when he cried unto his Lord (saying): Lo! the devil doth afflict me with distress and torment.
(And it was said unto him): Strike the ground with thy foot. This (spring) is a cool bath and a refreshing drink.
And We bestowed on him (again) his household and therewith the like thereof, a mercy from Us, and a memorial for men of understanding.
And (it was said unto him): Take in thine hand a branch and smite therewith, and break not thine oath. Lo! We found him steadfast, how excellent a slave! Lo! he was ever turning in repentance (to his Lord).
And make mention of Our bondmen, Abraham, Isaac and Jacob, men of parts and vision.
Lo! We purified them with a pure thought, remembrance of the Home (of the Hereafter).
Lo! in Our sight they are verily of the elect, the excellent.
And make mention of Ishmael and Elisha and Dhul-Kifl. All are of the chosen.
This is a reminder. And lo! for those who ward off (evil) is a happy journeys end,
Gardens of Eden, whereof the gates are opened for them,
Wherein, reclining, they call for plenteous fruit and cool drink (that is) therein.
And with them are those of modest gaze, companions.
This it is that ye are promised for the Day of Reckoning.
Lo! this in truth is Our provision, which will never waste away.
This (is for the righteous). And lo! for the transgressors there with be an evil journeys end,
Hell, where they will burn, an evil resting-place.
Here is a boiling and an ice-cold draught, so let them taste it,
And other (torment) of the kind in pairs (the two extremes)!
Here is an army rushing blindly with you. (Those who are already in the Fire say): No word of welcome for them. Lo! they will roast at the Fire.
They say: Nay, but you (misleaders), for you there is no word of welcome. Ye prepared this for us (by your misleading). Now hapless is the plight.
They say: Our Lord! Whoever did prepare this for us, oh, give him double portion of the Fire!
And they say: What aileth us that we behold not men whom we were wont to count among the wicked ?
Did we take them (wrongly) for a laughing-stock, or have our eyes missed them ?
Lo! that is very truth: the wrangling of the dwellers in the Fire.
Say (unto them, O Muhammad): I am only a warner, and there is no God save Allah, the One, the Absolute,
Lord of the heavens and the earth and all that is between them, the Mighty, the Pardoning.
Say: It is tremendous tidings
Whence ye turn away!
I had no knowledge of the Highest Chiefs when they disputed;
It is revealed unto me only that I may be a plain warner.
When thy Lord said unto the angels: Lo! I am about to create a mortal out of mire,
And when I have fashioned him and breathed into him of My Spirit, then fall down before him prostrate,
The angels fell down prostrate, every one,
Saving Iblis; he was scornful and became one of the disbelievers.
He said: O Iblis! What hindereth thee from falling prostrate before that which I have created with both My hands ? Art thou too proud or art thou of the high exalted ?
He said: I am better than him. Thou createdst me of fire, whilst him Thou didst create of clay.
He said: Go forth from hence, for lo! thou art outcast,
And lo! My curse is on thee till the Day of Judgment.
He said: My Lord! Reprieve me till the day when they are raised.
He said: Lo! thou art of those reprieved
Until the day of the time appointed.
He said: Then, by Thy might, I surely will beguile them every one,
Save Thy single-minded slaves among them.
He said: The Truth is, and the Truth I speak,
That I shall fill hell with thee and with such of them as follow thee, together.
Say (O Muhammad, unto mankind): I ask of you no fee for this, and I am no simulating.
Lo! it is naught else than a reminder for all peoples
And ye will come in time to know the truth thereof.
The revelation of the Scripture is from Allah, the Mighty, the Wise.
Lo! We have revealed the Scripture unto thee (Muhammad) with truth; so worship Allah, making religion pure for Him (only).
Surely pure religion is for Allah only. And those who choose protecting friends beside Him (say): We worship them only that they may bring us near unto Allah. Lo! Allah will judge between them concerning that wherein they differ. Lo! Allah guideth not him who is a liar, an ingrate.
If Allah had willed to choose a son, He could have chosen what He would of that which He hath created. Be He Glorified! He is Allah, the One, the Absolute.
He hath created the heavens and the earth with truth. He maketh night to succeed day, and He maketh day to succeed night, and He constraineth the sun and the moon to give service, each running on for an appointed term. Is not He the Mighty, the Forgiver ?
He created you from one being, then from that (being) He made its mate; and He hath provided for you of cattle eight kinds. He created you in the wombs of your mothers, creation after creation, in a threefold gloom. Such is Allah, your Lord. His is the Sovereignty. There is no God save Him. How then are ye turned away ?
If ye are thankless, yet Allah is Independent of you, though He is not pleased with thanklessness for His bondmen; and if ye are thankful He is pleased therewith for you. No laden soul will bear anothers load. Then unto your Lord is your return; and He will tell you what ye used to do. Lo! He knoweth what is in the breasts (of men).
And when some hurt toucheth man, he crieth unto his Lord, turning unto Him (repentant). Then, when He granteth him a boon from Him he forgetteth that for which he cried unto Him before, and setteth up rivals to Allah that he may beguile (men) from his way. Say (O Muhammad, unto such an one): Take pleasure in thy disbelief a while. Lo! thou art of the owners of the Fire.
Is he who payeth adoration in the watches of the night, prostrate and standing, bewaring of the Hereafter and hoping for the mercy of his Lord, (to be accounted equal with a disbeliever) ? Say (unto them, O Muhammad): Are those who know equal with those who know not ? But only men of understanding will pay heed.
Say: O My bondmen who believe! Observe your duty to your Lord. For those who do good in this world there is good, and Allahs earth is spacious. Verily the steadfast will be paid their wages without stint.
Say (O Muhammad): Lo! I am commanded to worship Allah, making religion pure for Him (only).
And I am commanded to be the first of those who are muslims (surrender unto Him).
Say: Lo! if I should disobey my Lord, I fear the doom of a tremendous Day.
Say: Allah I worship, making my religion pure for Him (only).
Then worship what ye will beside Him. Say: The losers will be those who lose themselves and their housefolk on the Day of Resurrection. Ah, that will be the manifest loss!
They have an awning of fire above them and beneath them a dais (of fire). With this doth Allah appal His bondmen. O My bondmen, therefor fear Me!
And those who put away false gods lest they should worship them and turn to Allah in repentance, for them there are glad tidings. Therefor give good tidings (O Muhammad) to My bondmen
Who hear advice and follow the best thereof. Such are those whom Allah guideth, and such are men of understanding.
Is he on whom the word of doom is fulfilled (to be helped), and canst thou (O Muhammad) rescue him who is in the Fire ?
But those who keep their duty to their Lord, for them are lofty halls with lofty halls above them, built (for them), beneath which rivers flow. (It is) a promise of Allah. Allah faileth not His promise.
Hast thou not seen how Allah hath sent down water from the sky and hath caused it to penetrate the earth as watersprings, and afterward thereby produceth crops of divers hues; and afterward they wither and thou seest them turn yellow; then He maketh them chaff. Lo! herein verily is a reminder for men of understanding.
Is he whose bosom Allah hath expanded for Al-Islam, so that he followeth a light from his Lord, (as he who disbelieveth) ? Then woe unto those whose hearts are hardened against remembrance of Allah. Such are in plain error.
Allah hath (now) revealed the fairest of statements, a Scripture consistent, (wherein promises of reward are) paired (with threats of punishment), whereat doth creep the flesh of those who fear their Lord, so that their flesh and their hearts soften to Allahs reminder. Such is Allahs guidance, wherewith He guideth whom He will. And him whom Allah sendeth astray, for him there is no guide.
Is he then, who will strike his face against the awful doom upon the Day of Resurrection (as he who doeth right) ? And it will be said unto the wrong-doers: Taste what ye used to earn.
Those before them denied, and so the doom came on them whence they knew not.
Thus Allah made them taste humiliation in the life of the world, and verily the doom of the Hereafter will be greater if they did but know.
And verily We have coined for mankind in this Quran all kinds of similitudes, that haply they may reflect;
A Lecture in Arabic, containing no crookedness, that haply they may ward off (evil).
Allah coineth a similitude: A man in relation to whom are several part-owners, quarrelling, and a man belonging wholly to one man. Are the two equal in similitude ? Praise be to Allah! But most of them know not.
Lo! thou wilt die, and lo! they will die;
Then lo! on the Day of Resurrection, before your Lord ye will dispute.
And who doth greater wrong than he who telleth a lie against Allah, and denieth the truth when it reacheth him ? Will not the home of disbelievers be in hell ?
And whoso bringeth the truth and believeth therein - Such are the dutiful.
They shall have what they will of their Lords bounty. That is the reward of the good:
That Allah will remit from them the worst of what they did, and will pay them for reward the best they used to do.
Will not Allah defend His slave ? Yet they would frighten thee with those beside Him. He whom Allah sendeth astray, for him there is no guide.
And he whom Allah guideth, for him there can be no misleader. Is not Allah Mighty, Able to Requite (the wrong) ?
And verily, if thou shouldst ask them: Who created the heavens and the earth ? they will say: Allah. Say: Bethink you then of those ye worship beside Allah, if Allah willed some hurt for me, could they remove from me His hurt; or if He willed some mercy for me, could they restrain His mercy ? Say: Allah is my all. In Him do (all) the trusting put their trust.
Say: O my people! Act in your manner. Lo! I (too) am acting. Thus ye will come to know
Who it is unto whom cometh a doom that will abase him, and on whom there falleth everlasting doom.
Lo! We have revealed unto thee (Muhammad) the Scripture for mankind with truth. Then whosoever goeth right it is for his soul, and whosoever strayeth, strayeth only to its hurt. And thou art not a warder over them.
Allah receiveth (mens) souls at the time of their death, and that (soul) which dieth not (yet) in its sleep. He keepeth that (soul) for which He hath ordained death and dismisseth the rest till an appointed term. Lo! herein verily are portents for people who take thought.
Or choose they intercessors other than Allah ? Say: What! Even though they have power over nothing and have no intelligence ?
Say: Unto Allah belongeth all intercession. His is the Sovereignty of the heavens and the earth. And afterward unto Him ye will be brought back.
And when Allah alone is mentioned, the hearts of those who believe not in the Hereafter are repelled, and when those (whom they worship) beside Him are mentioned, behold! they are glad.
Say: O Allah! Creator of the heavens and the earth! Knower of the Invisible and the Visible! Thou wilt judge between Thy slaves concerning that wherein they used to differ.
And though those who do wrong possess all that is in the earth, and therewith as much again, they verily will seek to ransom themselves therewith on the Day of Resurrection from the awful doom; and there will appear unto them, from their Lord, that wherewith they never reckoned.
And the evils that they earned will appear unto them, and that whereat they used to scoff will surround them.
Now when hurt toucheth a man he crieth unto Us, and afterward when We have granted him a boon from Us, he saith: Only by force of knowledge I obtained it. Nay, but it is a test. But most of them know not.
Those before them said it, yet (all) that they had earned availed them not;
But the evils that they earned smote them; and such of these as do wrong, the evils that they earn will smite them; they cannot escape.
Know they not that Allah enlargeth providence for whom He will, and straiteneth it (for whom He will). Lo! herein verily are portents for people who believe.
Say: O My slaves who have been prodigal to their own hurt! Despair not of the mercy of Allah, Who forgiveth all sins. Lo! He is the Forgiving, the Merciful.
Turn unto your Lord repentant, and surrender unto Him, before there come unto you the doom, when ye cannot be helped.
And follow the better (guidance) of that which is revealed unto you from your Lord, before the doom cometh on you suddenly when ye know not,
Lest any soul should say: Alas, my grief that I was unmindful of Allah, and I was indeed among the scoffers!
Or should say: If Allah had but guided me I should have been among the dutiful!
Or should say, when it seeth the doom: Oh, that I had but a second chance that I might be among the righteous!
(But now the answer will be): Nay, for My revelations came unto thee, but thou didst deny them and wast scornful and wast among the disbelievers.
And on the Day of Resurrection thou (Muhammad) seest those who lied concerning Allah with their faces blackened. Is not the home of the scorners in hell ?
And Allah delivereth those who ward off (evil) because of their deserts. Evil toucheth them not, nor do they grieve.
Allah is Creator of all things, and He is Guardian over all things.
His are the keys of the heavens and the earth, and they who disbelieve the revelations of Allah - such are they who are the losers.
Say (O Muhammad, to the disbelievers): Do ye bid me serve other than Allah ? O ye fools!
And verily it hath been revealed unto thee as unto those before thee (saying): If thou ascribe a partner to Allah thy work will fail and thou indeed wilt be among the losers.
Nay, but Allah must thou serve, and be among the thankful!
And they esteem not Allah as He hath the right to be esteemed, when the whole earth is His handful on the Day of Resurrection, and the heavens are rolled in His right hand. Glorified is He and High Exalted from all that they ascribe as partner (unto Him).
And the trumpet is blown, and all who are in the heavens and all who are in the earth swoon away, save him whom Allah willeth. Then it is blown a second time, and behold them standing waiting!
And the earth shineth with the light of her Lord, and the Book is set up, and the prophets and the witnesses are brought, and it is judged between them with truth, and they are not wronged.
And each soul is paid in full for what it did. And He is Best Aware of what they do.
And those who disbelieve are driven unto hell in troops till, when they reach it and the gates thereof are opened, and the warders thereof say unto them: Came there not unto you messengers of your own, reciting unto you the revelations of your Lord and warning you of the meeting of this your Day ? they say: Yea, verily. But the word of doom of disbelievers is fulfilled.
It is said (unto them): Enter ye the gates of hell to dwell therein. Thus hapless is the journeys end of the scorners.
And those who keep their duty to their Lord are driven unto the Garden in troops till, when they reach it, and the gates thereof are opened, and the warders thereof say unto them: Peace be unto you! Ye are good, so enter ye (the Garden of delight), to dwell therein;
They say: Praise be to Allah, Who hath fulfilled His promise unto us and hath made us inherit the land, sojourning in the Garden where we will! So bounteous is the wage of workers.
And thou (O Muhammad) seest the angels thronging round the Throne, hymning the praises of their Lord. And they are judged aright. And it is said: Praise be to Allah, the Lord of the Worlds!
Ha. Mim.
The revelation of the Scripture is from Allah, the Mighty, the Knower,
The Forgiver of sin, the Accepter of repentance, the Stern in punishment, the Bountiful. There is no God save Him. Unto Him is the journeying.
None argue concerning the revelations of Allah save those who disbelieve, so let not their turn of fortune in the land deceive thee (O Muhammad).
The folk of Noah and the factions after them denied (their messengers) before these, and every nation purposed to seize their messenger and argued falsely, (thinking) thereby to refute the Truth. Then I seized them, and how (awful) was My punishment.
Thus was the word of thy Lord concerning those who disbelieve fulfilled: That they are owners of the Fire.
Those who bear the Throne, and all who are round about it, hymn the praises of their Lord and believe in Him and ask forgiveness for those who believe (saying): Our Lord! Thou comprehendest all things in mercy and knowledge, therefor forgive those who repent and follow Thy way. Ward off from them the punishment of hell.
Our Lord! And make them enter the Gardens of Eden which thou hast promised them, with such of their fathers and their wives and their descendants as do right. Lo! Thou, only Thou, art the Mighty, the Wise.
And ward off from them ill-deeds; and he from whom Thou wardest off ill-deeds that day, him verily hast Thou taken into mercy. That is the supreme triumph.
Lo! (on that day) those who disbelieve are informed by proclamation: Verily Allahs abhorrence is more terrible than your abhorrence one of another, when ye were called unto the faith but did refuse.
They say: Our Lord! Twice hast Thou made us die, and twice hast Thou made us live. Now we confess our sins. Is there any way to go out ?
(It is said unto them): This is (your plight) because, when Allah only was invoked, ye disbelieved, but when some partner was ascribed to Him ye were believing. But the command belongeth only to Allah, the Sublime, the Majestic.
He it is Who showeth you His portents, and sendeth down for you provision from the sky. None payeth heed save him who turneth (unto Him) repentant.
Therefor (O believers) pray unto Allah, making religion pure for Him (only), however much the disbelievers be averse -
The Exalter of Ranks, the Lord of the Throne. He causeth the Spirit of His command upon whom He will of His slaves, that He may warn of the Day of Meeting,
The day when they come forth, nothing of them being hidden from Allah. Whose is the Sovereignty this day ? It is Allahs, the One, the Almighty.
This day is each soul requited that which it hath earned; no wrong (is done) this day. Lo! Allah is swift at reckoning.
Warn them (O Muhammad) of the Day of the approaching (doom), when the hearts will be choking the throats, (when) there will be no friend for the wrong-doers, nor any intercessor who will be heard.
He knoweth the traitor of the eyes, and that which the bosoms hide.
Allah judgeth with truth, while those to whom they cry instead of Him judge not at all. Lo! Allah, He is the Hearer, the Seer.
Have they not travelled in the land to see the nature of the consequence for those who disbelieved before them ? They were mightier than these in power and (in the) traces (which they left behind them) in the earth. Yet Allah seized them for their sins, and they had no protector from Allah.
That was because their messengers kept bringing them clear proofs (of Allahs Sovereignty) but they disbelieved; so Allah seized them. Lo! He is Strong, severe in punishment.
And verily We sent Moses with Our revelations and a clear warrant
Unto Pharaoh and Haman and Korah, but they said: A lying sorcerer!
And when he brought them the Truth from Our presence, they said: Slay the sons of those who believe with him, and spare their women. But the plot of disbelievers is in naught but error.
And Pharaoh said: Suffer me to kill Moses, and let him cry unto his Lord. Lo! I fear that he will alter your religion or that he will cause confusion in the land.
Moses said: Lo! I seek refuge in my Lord and your Lord from every scorner who believeth not in a Day of Reckoning.
And a believing man of Pharaohs family, who hid his faith, said: Would ye kill a man because he saith: My Lord is Allah, and hath brought you clear proofs from your Lord ? If he is lying, then his lie is upon him; and if he is truthful, then some of that wherewith he threateneth you will strike you. Lo! Allah guideth not one who is a prodigal, a liar.
O my people! Yours is the kingdom to-day, ye being uppermost in the land. But who would save us from the wrath of Allah should it reach us ? Pharaoh said: I do but show you what I think, and I do but guide you to wise policy.
And he who believed said: O my people! Lo! I fear for you a fate like that of the factions (of old);
A plight like that of Noahs folk, and Aad and Thamud, and those after them, and Allah willeth no injustice for (His) slaves.
And, O my people! Lo! I fear for you a Day of Summoning,
A day when ye will turn to flee, having no preserver from Allah: and he whom Allah sendeth astray, for him there is no guide.
And verily Joseph brought you of old clear proofs, yet ye ceased not to be in doubt concerning what he brought you till, when he died, ye said: Allah will not send any messenger after him. Thus Allah deceiveth him who is a prodigal, a doubter.
Those who wrangle concerning the revelations of Allah without any warrant that hath come unto them, it is greatly hateful in the sight of Allah and in the sight of those who believe. Thus doth Allah print on every arrogant, disdainful heart.
And Pharaoh said: O Haman! Build for me a tower that haply I may reach the roads,
The roads of the heavens, and may look upon the God of Moses, though verily I think him a liar. Thus was the evil that he did made fairseeming unto Pharaoh, and he was debarred from the (right) way. The plot of Pharaoh ended but in ruin.
And he who believed said: O my people! Follow me. I will show you the way of right conduct.
O my people! Lo! this life of the world is but a passing comfort, and lo! the Hereafter, that is the enduring home.
Whoso doeth an ill-deed, he will be repaid the like thereof, while whoso doeth right, whether male or female, and is a believer, (all) such will enter the Garden, where they will be nourished without stint.
And, O my people! What aileth me that I call you unto deliverance when ye call me unto the Fire ?
Ye call me to disbelieve in Allah and ascribe unto Him as partners that whereof I have no knowledge, while I call you unto the Mighty, the Forgiver.
Assuredly that whereunto ye call me hath no claim in the world or in the Hereafter, and our return will be unto Allah, and the prodigals will be owners of the Fire.
And ye will remember what I say unto you. I confide my cause unto Allah. Lo! Allah is Seer of (His) slaves.
So Allah warded off from him the evils which they plotted, while a dreadful doom encompassed Pharaohs folk,
The Fire; they are exposed to it morning and evening; and on the day when the Hour upriseth (it is said): Cause Pharaohs folk to enter the most awful doom.
And when they wrangle in the Fire, the weak say unto those who were proud: Lo! we were a following unto you; will ye therefor rid us of a portion of the Fire ?
Those who were proud say: Lo! we are all (together) herein. Lo! Allah hath judged between (His) slaves.
And those in the Fire say unto the guards of hell: Entreat your Lord that He relieve us of a day of the torment.
They say: Came not your messengers unto you with clear proofs ? They say: Yea, verily. They say: Then do ye pray, although the prayer of disbelievers is in vain.
Lo! We verily do help Our messengers, and those who believe, in the life of the world and on the day when the witnesses arise,
The day when their excuse availeth not the evil-doers, and theirs is the curse, and theirs the ill abode.
And We verily gave Moses the guidance, and We caused the Children of Israel to inherit the Scripture,
A guide and a reminder for men of understanding.
Then have patience (O Muhammad). Lo! the promise of Allah is true. And ask forgiveness of thy sin, and hymn the praise of thy Lord at fall of night and in the early hours.
Lo! those who wrangle concerning the revelations of Allah without a warrant having come unto them, there is naught else in their breasts save pride which they will never attain. So take thou refuge in Allah. Lo! He, only He, is the Hearer, the Seer.
Assuredly the creation of the heavens and the earth is greater than the creation of mankind; but most of mankind know not.
And the blind man and the seer are not equal, neither are those who believe and do good works (equal with) the evil-doer. Little do ye reflect!
Lo! the Hour is surely coming, there is no doubt thereof; yet most of mankind believe not.
And your Lord hath said: Pray unto Me and I will hear your prayer. Lo! those who scorn My service, they will enter hell, disgraced.
Allah it is Who hath appointed for you night that ye may rest therein, and day for seeing. Lo! Allah is a Lord of bounty for mankind, yet most of mankind give not thanks.
Such is Allah, your Lord, the Creator of all things, There is no God save Him. How then are ye perverted ?
Thus are they perverted who deny the revelations of Allah.
Allah it is Who appointed for you the earth for a dwelling-place and the sky for a canopy, and fashioned you and perfected your shapes, and hath provided you with good things. Such is Allah, your Lord. Then blessed be Allah, the Lord of the Worlds!
He is the Living One. There is no God save Him. So pray unto Him, making religion pure for Him (only). Praise be to Allah, the Lord of the Worlds!
Say (O Muhammad): I am forbidden to worship those unto whom ye cry beside Allah since there have come unto me clear proofs from my Lord, and I am commanded to surrender to the Lord of the Worlds.
He it is Who created you from dust, then from a drop (of seed) then from a clot, then bringeth you forth as a child, then (ordaineth) that ye attain full strength and afterward that ye become old men - though some among you die before - and that ye reach an appointed term, that haply ye may understand.
He it is Who quickeneth and giveth death. When He ordaineth a thing, He saith unto it only: Be! and it is.
Hast thou not seen those who wrangle concerning the revelations of Allah, how they are turned away ? -
Those who deny the Scripture and that wherewith We send Our messengers. But they will come to know,
When carcans are about their necks and chains. They are dragged
Through boiling waters; then they are thrust into the Fire.
Then it is said unto them: Where are (all) that ye used to make partners (in the Sovereignty)
Beside Allah ? They say: They have failed us; but we used not to pray to anything before. Thus doth Allah send astray the disbelievers (in His guidance).
(And it is said unto them): This is because ye exulted in the earth without right, and because ye were petulant.
Enter ye the gates of hell, to dwell therein. Evil is the habitation of the scornful.
Then have patience (O Muhammad). Lo! the promise of Allah is true. And whether we let thee see a part of that which We promise them, or (whether) We cause thee to die, still unto Us they will be brought back.
Verily We sent messengers before thee, among them those of whom We have told thee, and some of whom We have not told thee; and it was not given to any messenger that he should bring a portent save by Allahs leave, but when Allahs commandment cometh (the cause) is judged aright, and the followers of vanity will then be lost.
Allah it is Who hath appointed for you cattle, that ye may ride on some of them, and eat of some -
(Many) benefits ye have from them - and that ye may satisfy by their means a need that is in your breasts, and may be borne upon them as upon the ship.
And He showeth you His tokens. Which, then, of the tokens of Allah do ye deny ?
Have they not travelled in the land to see the nature of the consequence for those before them ? They were more numerous than these, and mightier in power and (in the) traces (which they left behind them) in the earth. But all that they used to earn availed them not.
And when their messengers brought them clear proofs (of Allahs Sovereignty) they exulted in the knowledge they (themselves) possessed. And that which they were wont to mock befell them.
Then, when they saw Our doom, they said: We believe in Allah only and reject (all) that we used to associate (with Him).
But their faith could not avail them when they saw Our doom. This is Allahs law which hath ever taken course for His bondmen. And then the disbelievers will be ruined.
Ha. Mim.
A revelation from the Beneficent, the Merciful,
A Scripture whereof the verses are expounded, a Lecture in Arabic for people who have knowledge,
Good tidings and a warning. But most of them turn away so that they hear not.
And they say: Our hearts are protected from that unto which thou (O Muhammad) callest us, and in our ears there is a deafness, and between us and thee there is a veil. Act, then. Lo! we also shall be acting.
Say (unto them O Muhammad): I am only a mortal like you. It is inspired in me that your God is One God, therefor take the straight path unto Him and seek forgiveness of Him. And woe unto the idolaters,
Who give not the poor-due, and who are disbelievers in the Hereafter.
Lo! as for those who believe and do good works, for them is a reward enduring.
Say (O Muhammad, unto the idolaters): Disbelieve ye verily in Him Who created the earth in two Days, and ascribe ye unto Him rivals ? He (and none else) is the Lord of the Worlds.
He placed therein firm hills rising above it, and blessed it and measured therein its sustenance in four Days, alike for (all) who ask;
Then turned He to the heaven when it was smoke, and said unto it and unto the earth: Come both of you, willingly or loth. They said: We come, obedient.
Then He ordained them seven heavens in two Days and inspired in each heaven its mandate; and We decked the nether heaven with lamps, and rendered it inviolable. That is the measuring of the Mighty, the Knower.
But if they turn away, then say: I warn you of a thunderbolt like the thunderbolt (which fell of old upon the tribes) of Aad and Thamud;
When their messengers came unto them from before them and behind them, saying: Worship none but Allah! they said: If our Lord had willed, He surely would have sent down angels (unto us), so lo! we are disbelievers in that wherewith ye have been sent.
As for Aad, they were arrogant in the land without right, and they said: Who is mightier than us in power ? Could they not see that Allah Who created them, He was mightier than them in power ? And they denied Our revelations.
Therefor We let loose on them a raging wind in evil days, that We might make them taste the torment of disgrace in the life of the world. And verily the doom of the Hereafter will be more shameful, and they will not be helped.
And as for Thamud, We gave them guidance, but they preferred blindness to the guidance, so the bolt of the doom of humiliation overtook them because of what they used to earn.
And We delivered those who believed and used to keep their duty to Allah.
And (make mention of) the day when the enemies of Allah are gathered unto the Fire, they are driven on
Till, when they reach it, their ears and their eyes and their skins testify against them as to what they used to do.
And they say unto their skins: Why testify ye against us ? They say: Allah hath given us speech Who giveth speech to all things, and Who created you at the first, and unto Whom ye are returned.
Ye did not hide yourselves lest your ears and your eyes and your skins should testify against you, but ye deemed that Allah knew not much of what ye did.
That, your thought which ye did think about your Lord, hath ruined you; and ye find yourselves (this day) among the lost.
And though they are resigned, yet the Fire is still their home; and if they ask for favour, yet they are not of those unto whom favour can be shown.
And We assigned them comrades (in the world), who made their present and their past fairseeming unto them. And the Word concerning nations of the jinn and humankind who passed away before them hath effect for them. Lo! they were ever losers.
Those who disbelieve say: Heed not this Quran, and drown the hearing of it; haply ye may conquer.
But verily We shall cause those who disbelieve to taste an awful doom, and verily We shall requite them the worst of what they used to do.
That is the reward of Allahs enemies: the Fire. Therein is their immortal home, payment forasmuch as they denied Our revelations.
And those who disbelieve will say: Our Lord! Show us those who beguiled us of the jinn and humankind. We will place them underneath our feet that they may be among the nethermost.
Lo! those who say: Our Lord is Allah, and afterward are upright, the angels descend upon them, saying: Fear not nor grieve, but hear good tidings of the paradise which ye are promised.
We are your protecting friends in the life of the world and in the Hereafter. There ye will have (all) that your souls desire, and there ye will have (all) for which ye pray.
A gift of welcome from One Forgiving, Merciful.
And who is better in speech than him who prayeth unto his Lord and doeth right, and saith: Lo! I am of those who are muslims (surrender unto Him).
The good deed and the evil deed are not alike. Repel the evil deed with one which is better, then lo! he, between whom and thee there was enmity (will become) as though he was a bosom friend.
But none is granted it save those who are steadfast, and none is granted it save the owner of great happiness.
And if a whisper from the devil reach thee (O Muhammad) then seek refuge in Allah. Lo! He is the Hearer, the Knower.
And of His portents are the night and the day and the sun and the moon. Adore not the sun not the moon; but adore Allah Who created them, if it is in truth Him Whom ye worship.
But if they are too proud - still those who are with thy Lord glorify Him night and day, and tire not.
And of His portents (is this): that thou seest the earth lowly, but when We send down water thereon it thrilleth and groweth. Lo! He Who quickeneth it is verily the Quickener of the Dead. Lo! He is Able to do all things.
Lo! those who distort Our revelations are not hid from Us. Is he who is hurled into the Fire better, or he who cometh secure on the Day of Resurrection ? Do what ye will. Lo! He is Seer of what ye do.
Lo! those who disbelieve in the Reminder when it cometh unto them (are guilty), for lo! it is an unassailable Scripture.
Falsehood cannot come at it from before it or from behind it. (It is) a revelation from the Wise, the Owner of Praise.
Naught is said unto thee (Muhammad) save what was said unto the messengers before thee. Lo! thy Lord is owner of forgiveness, and owner (also) of dire punishment.
And if We had appointed it a Lecture in a foreign tongue they would assuredly have said: If only its verses were expounded (so that we might understand) ? What! A foreign tongue and an Arab ? - Say unto them (O Muhammad): For those who believe it is a guidance and a healing; and as for those who disbelieve, there is a deafness in their ears, and it is blindness for them. Such are called to from afar.
And We verily gave Moses the Scripture, but there hath been dispute concerning it; and but for a Word that had already gone forth from thy Lord, it would ere now have been judged between them; but lo! they are in hopeless doubt concerning it.
Whoso doeth right it is for his soul, and whoso doeth wrong it is against it. And thy Lord is not at all a tyrant to His slaves.
Unto Him is referred (all) knowledge of the Hour. And no fruits burst forth from their sheaths, and no female carrieth or bringeth forth but with His knowledge. And on the day when He calleth unto them: Where are now My partners ? they will say: We confess unto Thee, not one of us is a witness (for them).
And those to whom they used to cry of old have failed them, and they perceive they have no place of refuge.
Man tireth not of praying for good, and if ill toucheth him, then he is disheartened, desperate.
And verily, if We cause him to taste mercy after some hurt that hath touched him, he will say: This is my own; and I deem not that the Hour will ever rise, and if I am brought back to my Lord, I surely shall be better off with Him - But We verily shall tell those who disbelieve (all) that they did, and We verily shall make them taste hard punishment.
When We show favour unto man, he withdraweth and turneth aside, but when ill toucheth him then he aboundeth in prayer.
Bethink you: If it is from Allah and ye reject it - Who is further astray than one who is at open feud (with Allah) ?
We shall show them Our portents on the horizons and within themselves until it will be manifest unto them that it is the Truth. Doth not thy Lord suffice, since He is Witness over all things ?
How! Are they still in doubt about the meeting with their Lord ? Lo! Is not He surrounding all things ?
Ha. Mim.
Ain. Sin. Qaf.
Thus Allah the Mighty, the Knower inspireth thee (Muhammad) as (He inspired) those before thee.
Unto Him belongeth all that is in the heavens and all that is in the earth, and He is the Sublime, the Tremendous.
Almost might the heavens above be rent asunder while the angels hymn the praise of their Lord and ask forgiveness for those on the earth. Lo! Allah, He is the Forgiver, the Merciful.
And as for those who choose protecting friends beside Him, Allah is Warden over them, and thou art in no wise a guardian over them.
And thus We have inspired in thee a Lecture in Arabic, that thou mayst warn the mother-town and those around it, and mayst warn of a day of assembling whereof there is no doubt. A host will be in the Garden, and a host of them in the Flame.
Had Allah willed, He could have made them one community, but Allah bringeth whom He will into His mercy. And the wrong-doers have no friend nor helper.
Or have they chosen protecting friends besides Him ? But Allah, He (alone) is the Protecting Friend. He quickeneth the dead, and He is Able to do all things.
And in whatsoever ye differ, the verdict therein belongeth to Allah. Such is my Lord, in Whom I put my trust, and unto Whom I turn.
The Creator of the heavens and the earth. He hath made for you pairs of yourselves, and of the cattle also pairs, whereby He multiplieth you. Naught is as His likeness; and He is the Hearer, the Seer.
His are the keys of the heavens and the earth. He enlargeth providence for whom He will and straiteneth (it for whom He will). Lo! He is Knower of all things.
He hath ordained for you that religion which He commended unto Noah, and that which We inspire in thee (Muhammad), and that which We commended unto Abraham and Moses and Jesus, saying: Establish the religion, and be not divided therein. Dreadful for the idolaters is that unto which thou callest them. Allah chooseth for Himself whom He will, and guideth unto Himself him who turneth (toward Him).
And they were not divided until after the knowledge came unto them, through rivalry among themselves; and had it not been for a Word that had already gone forth from thy Lord for an appointed term, it surely had been judged between them. And those who were made to inherit the Scripture after them are verily in hopeless doubt concerning it.
Unto this, then, summon (O Muhammad). And be thou upright as thou art commanded, and follow not their lusts, but say: I believe in whatever scripture Allah hath sent down, and I am commanded to be just among you. Allah is our Lord and your Lord. Unto us our works and unto you your works; no argument between us and you. Allah will bring us together, and unto Him is the journeying.
And those who argue concerning Allah after He hath been acknowledged, their argument hath no weight with their Lord, and wrath is upon them and theirs will be an awful doom.
Allah it is Who hath revealed the Scripture with truth, and the Balance. How canst thou know ? It may be that the Hour is nigh.
Those who believe not therein seek to hasten it, while those who believe are fearful of it and know that it is the Truth. Are not they who dispute, in doubt concerning the Hour, far astray ?
Allah is gracious unto His slaves. He provideth for whom He will. And He is the Strong, the Mighty.
Whoso desireth the harvest of the Hereafter, We give him increase in its harvest. And whoso desireth the harvest of the world, We give him thereof, and he hath no portion in the Hereafter.
Or have they partners (of Allah) who have made lawful for them in religion that which Allah allowed not ? And but for a decisive word (gone forth already), it would have been judged between them. Lo! for wrong-doers is a painful doom.
Thou seest the wrong-doers fearful of that which they have earned, and it will surely befall them, while those who believe and do good works (will be) in flowering meadows of the Gardens, having what they wish from their Lord. This is the great preferment.
This it is which Allah announceth unto His bondmen who believe and do good works. Say (O Muhammad, unto mankind): I ask of you no fee therefor, save lovingkindness among kinsfolk. And whoso scoreth a good deed We add unto its good for him. Lo! Allah is Forgiving, Responsive.
Or say they: He hath invented a lie concerning Allah ? If Allah willed, He could have sealed thy heart (against them). And Allah will wipe out the lie and will vindicate the truth by His words. Lo! He is Aware of what is hidden in the breasts (of men).
And He it is Who accepteth repentance from His bondmen, and pardoneth the evil deeds, and knoweth what ye do,
And accepteth those who do good works, and giveth increase unto them of His bounty. And as for disbelievers, theirs will be an awful doom.
And if Allah were to enlarge the provision for His slaves they would surely rebel in the earth, but He sendeth down by measure as He willeth. Lo! He is Informed, a Seer of His bondmen.
And He it is Who sendeth down the saving rain after they have despaired, and spreadeth out His mercy. He is the Protecting Friend, the Praiseworthy.
And of His portents is the creation of the heaven and the earth, and of whatever beasts He hath dispersed therein. And He is Able to gather them when He will.
Whatever of misfortune striketh you, it is what your right hands have earned. And He forgiveth much.
Ye cannot escape in the earth, for beside Allah ye have no protecting friend nor any helper.
And of His portents are the ships, like banners on the sea;
If He will He calmeth the wind so that they keep still upon its surface - Lo! herein verily are signs for every steadfast grateful (heart). -
Or He causeth them to perish on account of that which they have earned - And He forgiveth much -
And that those who argue concerning Our revelations may know they have no refuge.
Now whatever ye have been given is but a passing comfort for the life of the world, and that which Allah hath is better and more lasting for those who believe and put their trust in their Lord,
And those who shun the worst of sins and indecencies and, when they are wroth, forgive,
And those who answer the call of their Lord and establish worship, and whose affairs are a matter of counsel, and who spend of what We have bestowed on them,
And those who, when great wrong is done to them, defend themselves,
The guerdon of an ill-deed is an ill the like thereof. But whosoever pardoneth and amendeth, his wage is the affair of Allah. Lo! He loveth not wrong-doers.
And whoso defendeth himself after he hath suffered wrong - for such, there is no way (of blame) against them.
The way (of blame) is only against those who oppress mankind, and wrongfully rebel in the earth. For such there is a painful doom.
And verily whoso is patient and forgiveth - lo! that, verily, is (of) the steadfast heart of things.
He whom Allah sendeth astray, for him there is no protecting friend after Him. And thou (Muhammad) wilt see the evil-doers when they see the doom, (how) they say: Is there any way of return ?
And thou wilt see them exposed to (the Fire), made humble by disgrace, and looking with veiled eyes. And those who believe will say: Lo! the (eternal) losers are they who lose themselves and their housefolk on the Day of Resurrection. Lo! are not the wrong-doers in perpetual torment ?
And they will have no protecting friends to help them instead of Allah. He whom Allah sendeth astray, for him there is no road.
Answer the call of your Lord before there cometh unto you from Allah a Day which there is no averting. Ye have no refuge on that Day, nor have a ye any (power of) refusal.
But if they are averse, We have not sent thee as a warder over them. Thine is only to convey (the message). And lo! when We cause man to taste of mercy from Us he exulteth therefor. And if some evil striketh them because of that which their own hands have sent before, then lo! man is an ingrate.
Unto Allah belongeth the Sovereignty of the heavens and the earth. He createth what He will. He bestoweth female (offspring) upon whom He will, and bestoweth male (offspring) upon whom He will;
Or He mingleth them, males and females, and He maketh barren whom He will. Lo! He is Knower, Powerful.
And it was not (vouchsafed) to any mortal that Allah should speak to him unless (it be) by revelation or from behind a veil, or (that) He sendeth a messenger to reveal what He will by His leave. Lo! He is Exalted, Wise.
And thus have We inspired in thee (Muhammad) a Spirit of Our command. Thou knewest not what the Scripture was, nor what the Faith. But We have made it a light whereby We guide whom We will of Our bondmen. And lo! thou verily dost guide unto a right path,
The path of Allah, unto Whom belongeth whatsoever is in the heavens and whatsoever is in the earth. Do not all things reach Allah at last ?
Ha. Mim.
By the Scripture which maketh plain,
Lo! We have appointed it a Lecture, in Arabic that haply ye may understand.
And Lo! in the Source of Decrees, which We possess, it is indeed sublime, decisive.
Shall We utterly ignore you because ye are a wanton folk ?
How many a prophet did We send among the men of old!
And never came there unto them a prophet but they used to mock him.
Then We destroyed men mightier than these in prowess; and the example of the men of old hath gone (before them).
And if thou (Muhammad) ask them: Who created the heavens and the earth, they will surely answer: The Mighty, the Knower created them;
Who made the earth a resting-place for you, and placed roads for you therein, that haply ye may find your way;
And Who sendeth down water from the sky in (due) measure, and We revive a dead land therewith. Even so will ye be brought forth;
He Who created all the pairs, and appointed for you ships and cattle whereupon ye ride.
That ye may mount upon their backs, and may remember your Lords favour when ye mount thereon, and may say: Glorified be He Who hath subdued these unto us, and we were not capable (of subduing them);
And lo! unto our Lord we surely are returning.
And they allot to Him a portion of His bondmen! Lo! man is verily a mere ingrate.
Or chooseth He daughters of all that He hath created, and honoureth He you with sons ?
And if one of them hath tidings of that which he likeneth to the Beneficent One, his countenance becometh black and he is full of inward rage.
(Liken they then to Allah) that which is bred up in outward show, and in dispute cannot make itself plain ?
And they make the angels, who are the slaves of the Beneficent, females. Did they witness their creation ? Their testimony will be recorded and they will be questioned.
And they say: If the Beneficent One had (so) willed, we should not have worshipped them. They have no knowledge whatsoever of that. They do but guess.
Or have We given them any scripture before (this Quran) so that they are holding fast thereto ?
Nay, for they say only: Lo! we found our fathers following a religion, and we are guided by their footprints.
And even so We sent not a warner before thee (Muhammad) into any township but its luxurious ones said: Lo! we found our fathers following a religion, and we are following their footprints.
(And the warner) said: What! Even though I bring you better guidance than that ye found your fathers following ? They answered: Lo! in what ye bring we are disbelievers.
So We requited them. Then see the nature of the consequence for the rejecters!
And when Abraham said unto his father and his folk: Lo! I am innocent of what ye worship
Save Him Who did create me, for He will surely guide me.
And he made it a word enduring among his seed, that haply they might return.
Nay, but I let these and their fathers enjoy life (only) till there should come unto them the Truth and a messenger making plain.
And now that the Truth hath come unto them they say: This is mere magic, and lo! we are disbelievers therein.
And they say: If only this Quran had been revealed to some great man of the two towns ?
Is it they who apportion thy Lords mercy ? We have apportioned among them their livelihood in the life of the world, and raised some of them above others in rank that some of them may take labour from others; and the mercy of thy Lord is better than (the wealth) that they amass.
And were it not that mankind would have become one community, We might well have appointed, for those who disbelieve in the Beneficent, roofs of silver for their houses and stairs (of silver) whereby to mount,
And for their houses doors (of silver) and couches of silver whereon to recline,
And ornaments of gold. Yet all that would have been but a provision of the life of the world. And the Hereafter with your Lord would have been for those who keep from evil.
And he whose sight is dim to the remembrance of the Beneficent, We assign unto him a devil who becometh his comrade;
And lo! they surely turn them from the way of Allah, and yet they deem that they are rightly guided;
Till, when he cometh unto Us, he saith (unto his comrade): Ah, would that between me and thee there were the distance of the two horizons - an evil comrade!
And it profiteth you not this day, because ye did wrong, that ye will be sharers in the doom.
Canst thou (Muhammad) make the deaf to hear, or canst thou guide the blind or him who is in error manifest ?
And if We take thee away, We surely shall take vengeance on them,
Or (if) We show thee that wherewith We threaten them; for lo! We have complete command of them.
So hold thou fast to that which is inspired in thee. Lo! thou art on a right path.
And lo! it is in truth a Reminder for thee and for thy folk; and ye will be questioned.
And ask those of Our messengers whom We sent before thee: Did We ever appoint gods to be worshipped beside the Beneficent ?
And verily We sent Moses with Our revelations unto Pharaoh and his chiefs, and he said: I am a messenger of the Lord of the Worlds.
But when he brought them Our tokens, behold! they laughed at them.
And every token that We showed them was greater than its sister (token), and We grasped them with the torment, that haply they might turn again.
And they said: O wizard! Entreat thy Lord for us by the pact that He hath made with thee. Lo! we verily will walk aright.
But when We eased them of the torment, behold! they broke their word.
And Pharaoh caused a proclamation to be made among his people saying: O my people! Is not mine the sovereignty of Egypt and these rivers flowing under me ? Can ye not then discern ?
I am surely better than this fellow, who is despicable and can hardly make (his meaning) plain!
Why, then, have armlets of gold not been set upon him, or angels sent along with him ?
Thus he persuaded his people to make light (of Moses), and they obeyed him. Lo! they were a wanton folk.
So, when they angered Us, We punished them and drowned them every one.
And We made them a thing past, and an example for those after (them).
And when the son of Mary is quoted as an example, behold! the folk laugh out,
And say: Are our gods better, or is he ? They raise not the objection save for argument. Nay! but they are a contentious folk.
He is nothing but a slave on whom We bestowed favour, and We made him a pattern for the Children of Israel.
And had We willed We could have set among you angels to be viceroys in the earth.
And lo! verily there is knowledge of the Hour. So doubt ye not concerning it, but follow Me. This is the right path.
And let not Satan turn you aside. Lo! he is an open enemy for you.
When Jesus came with clear proofs (of Allahs Sovereignty), he said: I have come unto you with wisdom, and to make plain some of that concerning which ye differ. So keep your duty to Allah, and obey me.
Lo! Allah, He is my Lord and your Lord. So worship Him. This is a right path.
But the factions among them differed. Then woe unto those who do wrong from the doom of a painful day.
Await they aught save the Hour, that it shall come upon them suddenly, when they know not ?
Friends on that day will be foes one to another, save those who kept their duty (to Allah).
O My slaves! For you there is no fear this day, nor is it ye who grieve;
(Ye) who believed Our revelations and were self-surrendered,
Enter the Garden, ye and your wives, to be made glad.
Therein are brought round for them trays of gold and goblets, and therein is all that souls desire and eyes find sweet. And ye are immortal therein.
This is the Garden which ye are made to inherit because of what ye used to do.
Therein for you is fruit in plenty whence to eat.
Lo! the guilty are immortal in hells torment.
It is not relaxed for them, and they despair therein.
We wronged them not, but they it was who did the wrong.
And they cry: O master! Let thy Lord make an end of us. He saith: Lo! here ye must remain.
We verily brought the Truth unto you, but ye were, most of you, averse to the Truth.
Or do they determine any thing (against the Prophet) ? Lo! We (also) are determining.
Or deem they that We cannot hear their secret thoughts and private confidences ? Nay, but Our envoys, present with them, do record.
Say (O Muhammad): If the Beneficent One hath a son, then, I shall be first among the worshippers. (But there is no son).
Glorified be the Lord of the heavens and the earth, the Lord of the Throne, from that which they ascribe (unto Him)!
So let them flounder (in their talk) and play until they meet the Day which they are promised.
And He it is Who in the heaven is God, and in the earth God. He is the Wise, the Knower.
And blessed be He unto Whom belongeth the Sovereignty of the heavens and the earth and all that is between them, and with Whom is knowledge of the Hour, and unto Whom ye will be returned.
And those unto whom they cry instead of Him possess no power of intercession, saving him who beareth witness unto the Truth knowingly.
And if thou ask them who created them, they will surely say: Allah. How then are they turned away ?
And he saith: O my Lord! Lo! these are a folk who believe not.
Then bear with them (O Muhammad) and say: Peace. But they will come to know.
Ha. Mim.
By the Scripture that maketh plain
Lo! We revealed it on a blessed night - Lo! We are ever warning -
Whereon every wise command is made clear
As a command from Our presence - Lo! We are ever sending -
A mercy from thy Lord. Lo! He, even He is the Hearer, the Knower,
Lord of the heavens and the earth and all that is between them, if ye would be sure.
There is no God save Him. He quickeneth and giveth death; your Lord and Lord of your forefathers.
Nay, but they play in doubt.
But watch thou (O Muhammad) for the day when the sky will produce visible smoke
That will envelop the people. This will be a painful torment.
(Then they will say): Our Lord relieve us of the torment. Lo! we are believers.
How can there be remembrance for them, when a messenger making plain (the Truth) had already come unto them,
And they had turned away from him and said: One taught (by others), a madman ?
Lo! We withdraw the torment a little. Lo! ye return (to disbelief).
On the day when We shall seize them with the greater seizure, (then) in truth We shall punish.
And verily We tried before them Pharaohs folk, when there came unto them a noble messenger,
Saying: Give up to me the slaves of Allah. Lo! I am a faithful messenger unto you.
And saying: Be not proud against Allah. Lo! I bring you a clear warrant.
And lo! I have sought refuge in my Lord and your Lord lest ye stone me to death.
And if ye put no faith in me, then let me go.
And he cried unto his Lord, (saying): These are guilty folk.
Then (his Lord commanded): Take away My slaves by night. Lo! ye will be followed,
And leave the sea behind at rest, for lo! they are a drowned host.
How many were the gardens and the watersprings that they left behind,
And the cornlands and the goodly sites
And pleasant things wherein they took delight!
Even so (it was), and We made it an inheritance for other folk;
And the heaven and the earth wept not for them, nor were they reprieved.
And We delivered the Children of Israel from the shameful doom;
(We delivered them) from Pharaoh. Lo! he was a tyrant of the wanton ones.
And We chose them, purposely, above (all) creatures.
And We gave them portents wherein was a clear trial.
Lo! these, forsooth, are saying:
There is naught but our first death, and we shall not be raised again.
Bring back our fathers, if ye speak the truth!
Are they better, or the folk of Tubba and those before them ? We destroyed them, for surely they were guilty.
And We created not the heavens and the earth, and all that is between them, in play.
We created them not save with truth; but most of them know not.
Assuredly the Day of Decision is the term for all of them,
A day when friend can in naught avail friend, nor can they be helped,
Save him on whom Allah hath mercy. Lo! He is the Mighty, the Merciful.
Lo! the tree of Zaqqum,
The food of the sinner!
Like molten brass, it seetheth in their bellies
As the seething of boiling water.
(And it will be said): Take him and drag him to the midst of hell,
Then pour upon his head the torment of boiling water.
(Saying): Taste! Lo! thou wast forsooth the mighty, the noble!
Lo! this is that whereof ye used to doubt.
Lo! those who kept their duty will be in a place secured.
Amid gardens and watersprings,
Attired in silk and silk embroidery, facing one another.
Even so (it will be). And We shall wed them unto fair ones with wide, lovely eyes.
They call therein for every fruit in safety.
They taste not death therein, save the first death. And He hath saved them from the doom of hell,
A bounty from thy Lord. That is the supreme triumph.
And We have made (this Scripture) easy in thy language only that they may heed.
Wait then (O Muhammad). Lo! they (too) are waiting.
Ha. Mim.
The revelation of the Scripture is from Allah, the Mighty, the Wise.
Lo! in the heavens and the earth are portents for believers.
And in your creation, and all the beasts that He scattereth in the earth, are portents for a folk whose faith is sure.
And the difference of night and day and the provision that Allah sendeth down from the sky and thereby quickeneth the earth after her death, and the ordering of the winds, are portents for a people who have sense.
These are the portents of Allah which We recite unto thee (Muhammad) with truth. Then in what fact, after Allah and His portents, will they believe ?
Woe unto each sinful liar,
Who heareth the revelations of Allah recited unto him, and then continueth in pride as though he heard them not. Give him tidings of a painful doom.
And when he knoweth aught of Our revelations he maketh it a jest. For such there is a shameful doom.
Beyond them there is hell, and that which they have earned will naught avail them, nor those whom they have chosen for protecting friends beside Allah. Theirs will be an awful doom.
This is guidance. And those who disbelieve the revelations of their Lord, for them there is a painful doom of wrath.
Allah it is Who hath made the sea of service unto you that the ships may run thereon by His command, and that ye may seek of His bounty, and that haply ye may be thankful;
And hath made of service unto you whatsoever is in the heavens and whatsoever is in the earth; it is all from Him. Lo! herein verily are portents for a people who reflect.
Tell those who believe to forgive those who hope not for the days of Allah; in order that He may requite folk what they used to earn.
Whoso doeth right, it is for his soul, and whoso doeth wrong, it is against it. And afterward unto your Lord ye will be brought back.
And verily we gave the Children of Israel the Scripture and the Command and the Prophethood, and provided them with good things and favoured them above (all) peoples;
And gave them plain commandments. And they differed not until after the knowledge came unto them, through rivalry among themselves. Lo! thy Lord will judge between them on the Day of Resurrection concerning that wherein they used to differ.
And now have We set thee (O Muhammad) on a clear road of (Our) commandment; so follow it, and follow not the whims of those who know not.
Lo! they can avail thee naught against Allah. And lo! as for the wrong-doers, some of them are friends of others; and Allah is the Friend of those who ward off (evil).
This is clear indication for mankind, and a guidance and a mercy for a folk whose faith is sure.
Or do those who commit ill-deeds suppose that We shall make them as those who believe and do good works, the same in life and death ? Bad is their judgment!
And Allah hath created the heavens and the earth with truth, and that every soul may be repaid what it hath earned. And they will not be wronged.
Hast thou seen him who maketh his desire his god, and Allah sendeth him astray purposely, and sealeth up his hearing and his heart, and setteth on his sight a covering ? Then who will lead him after Allah (hath condemned him) ? Will ye not then heed ?
And they say: There is naught but our life of the world; we die and we live, and naught destroyeth us save time; when they have no knowledge whatsoever of (all) that; they do but guess.
And when Our clear revelations are recited unto them their only argument is that they say: Bring (back) our fathers. then, if ye are truthful.
Say (unto them, O Muhammad): Allah giveth life to you, then causeth you to die, then gathereth you unto the Day of Resurrection whereof there is no doubt. But most of mankind know not.
And unto Allah belongeth the Sovereignty of the heavens and the earth; and on the day when the Hour riseth, on that day those who follow falsehood will be lost.
And thou wilt see each nation crouching, each nation summoned to its record. (And it will be said unto them): This day ye are requited what ye used to do.
This Our Book pronounceth against you with truth. Lo! We have caused (all) that ye did to be recorded.
Then, as for those who believed and did good works, their Lord will bring them in unto His mercy. That is the evident triumph.
And as for those who disbelieved (it will be said unto them): Were not Our revelations recited unto you ? But ye were scornful and became a guilty folk.
And when it was said: Lo! Allahs promise is the truth, and there is no doubt of the Hours coming, ye said: We know not what the Hour is. We deem it naught but a conjecture, and we are by no means convinced.
And the evils of what they did will appear unto them, and that which they used to deride will befall them.
And it will be said: This day We forget you, even as ye forgot the meeting of this your day; and your habitation is the Fire, and there is none to help you.
This, forasmuch as ye made the revelations of Allah a jest, and the life of the world beguiled you. Therefor this day they come not forth from thence, nor can they make amends.
Then praise be to Allah, Lord of the heavens and Lord of the earth, the Lord of the Worlds.
And unto Him (alone) belongeth Majesty in the heavens and the earth, and He is the Mighty, the Wise.
Ha. Mim.
The revelation of the Scripture is from Allah the Mighty, the Wise.
We created not the heavens and the earth and all that is between them save with truth, and for a term appointed. But those who disbelieve turn away from that whereof they are warned.
Say (unto them, O Muhammad): Have ye thought on all that ye invoke beside Allah ? Show me what they have created of the earth. Or have they any portion in the heavens ? Bring me a scripture before this (Scripture), or some vestige of knowledge (in support of what ye say), if ye are truthful.
And who is further astray than those who, instead of Allah, pray unto such as hear not their prayer until the Day of Resurrection, and are unconscious of their prayer,
And when mankind are gathered (to the Judgment) will become enemies for them, and will become deniers of having been worshipped.
And when Our clear revelations are recited unto them, those who disbelieve say of the Truth when it reacheth them: This is mere magic.
Or say they: He hath invented it ? Say (O Muhammad): If I have invented it, still ye have no power to support me against Allah. He is Best Aware of what ye say among yourselves concerning it. He sufficeth for a witness between me and you. And He is the Forgiving, the Merciful.
Say: I am no new thing among the messengers (of Allah), nor know I what will be done with me or with you. I do but follow that which is inspired in me, and I am but a plain warner.
Bethink you: If it is from Allah and ye disbelieve therein, and a witness of the Children of Israel hath already testified to the like thereof and hath believed, and ye are too proud (what plight is yours) ? Lo! Allah guideth not wrong-doing folk.
And those who disbelieve say of those who believe: If it had been (any) good, they would not have been before us in attaining it. And since they will not be guided by it, they say: This is an ancient lie;
When before it there was the Scripture of Moses, an example and a mercy; and this is a confirming Scripture in the Arabic language, that it may warn those who do wrong and bring good tidings for the righteous.
Lo! those who say: Our Lord is Allah, and thereafter walk aright, there shall no fear come upon them neither shall they grieve.
Such are rightful owners of the Garden, immortal therein, as a reward for what they used to do.
And We have commended unto man kindness toward parents. His mother beareth him with reluctance, and bringeth him forth with reluctance, and the bearing of him and the weaning of him is thirty months, till, when he attaineth full strength and reacheth forty years, he saith: My Lord! Arouse me that I may give thanks for the favour wherewith Thou hast favoured me and my parents, and that I may do right acceptable unto Thee. And be gracious unto me in the matter of my seed. Lo! I have turned unto Thee repentant, and lo! I am of those who surrender (unto Thee).
Those are they from whom We accept the best of what they do, and overlook their evil deeds. (They are) among the owners of the Garden. This is the true promise which they were promised (in the world).
And whoso saith unto his parents: Fie upon you both! Do ye threaten me that I shall be brought forth (again) when generations before me have passed away ? And they twain cry unto Allah for help (and say): Woe unto thee! Believe! Lo! the promise of Allah is true. But he saith: This is naught save fables of the men of old:
Such are those on whom the Word concerning nations of the jinn and mankind which have passed away before them hath effect. Lo! they are the losers.
And for all there will be ranks from what they do, that He may pay them for their deeds; and they will not be wronged.
And on the day when those who disbelieve are exposed to the Fire (it will be said): Ye squandered your good things in the life of the world and sought comfort therein. Now this day ye are rewarded with the doom of ignominy because ye were disdainful in the land without a right, and because ye used to transgress.
And make mention (O Muhammad) of the brother of Aad when he warned his folk among the wind-curved sandhills - and verily warners came and went before and after him - saying: Serve none but Allah. Lo! I fear for you the doom of a tremendous Day.
They said: Hast come to turn us away from our gods ? Then bring upon us that wherewith thou threatenest us, if thou art of the truthful.
He said: The knowledge is with Allah only. I convey unto you that wherewith I have been sent, but I see you are a folk that know not.
Then, when they beheld it as a dense cloud coming toward their valleys, they said: Here is a cloud bringing us rain. Nay, but it is that which ye did seek to hasten, a wind wherein is painful torment,
Destroying all things by commandment of its Lord. And morning found them so that naught could be seen save their dwellings. Thus do We reward the guilty folk.
And verily We had empowered them with that wherewith We have not empowered you, and had assigned them ears and eyes and hearts; but their ears and eyes and hearts availed them naught since they denied the revelations of Allah; and what they used to mock befell them.
And verily We have destroyed townships round about you, and displayed (for them) Our revelation, that haply they might return.
Then why did those whom they had chosen for gods as a way of approach (unto Allah) not help them ? Nay, but they did fail them utterly. And (all) that was their lie, and what they used to invent.
And when We inclined toward thee (Muhammad) certain of the jinn, who wished to hear the Quran and, when they were in its presence, said: Give ear! and, when it was finished, turned back to their people, warning.
They said: O our people! Lo! we have heard a scripture which hath been revealed after Moses, confirming that which was before it, guiding unto the truth and a right road.
O our people! respond to Allahs summoner and believe in Him. He will forgive you some of your sins and guard you from a painful doom.
And whoso respondeth not to Allahs summoner he can nowise escape in the earth, and he hath no protecting friends instead of Him. Such are in error manifest.
Have they not seen that Allah, Who created the heavens and the earth and was not wearied by their creation, is Able to give life to the dead ? Aye, He verily is Able to do all things.
And on the day when those who disbelieve are exposed to the Fire (they will be asked): Is not this real ? They will say: Yea, by our Lord. He will say: Then taste the doom for that ye disbelieved.
Then have patience (O Muhammad) even as the stout of heart among the messengers (of old) had patience, and seek not to hasten on (the doom) for them. On the day when they see that which they are promised (it will seem to them) as though they had tarried but an hour of daylight. A clear message. Shall any be destroyed save evil-living folk ?
Those who disbelieve and turn (men) from the way of Allah, He rendereth their actions vain.
And those who believe and do good works and believe in that which is revealed unto Muhammad - and it is the truth from their Lord - He riddeth them of their ill-deeds and improveth their state.
That is because those who disbelieve follow falsehood and because those who believe follow the truth from their Lord. Thus Allah coineth their similitudes for mankind.
Now when ye meet in battle those who disbelieve, then it is smiting of the necks until, when ye have routed them, then making fast of bonds; and afterward either grace or ransom till the war lay down its burdens. That (is the ordinance). And if Allah willed He could have punished them (without you) but (thus it is ordained) that He may try some of you by means of others. And those who are slain in the way of Allah, He rendereth not their actions vain.
He will guide them and improve their state,
And bring them in unto the Garden which He hath made known to them.
O ye who believe! If ye help Allah, He will help you and will make your foothold firm.
And those who disbelieve, perdition is for them, and He will make their actions vain.
That is because they are averse to that which Allah hath revealed, therefor maketh He their actions fruitless.
Have they not travelled in the land to see the nature of the consequence for those who were before them ? Allah wiped them out. And for the disbelievers there will be the like thereof.
That is because Allah is patron of those who believe, and because the disbelievers have no patron.
Lo! Allah will cause those who believe and do good works to enter Gardens underneath which rivers flow; while those who disbelieve take their comfort in this life and eat even as the cattle eat, and the Fire is their habitation.
And how many a township stronger than thy township (O Muhammad) which hath cast thee out, have We destroyed, and they had no helper!
Is he who relieth on a clear proof from his Lord like those for whom the evil that they do is beautified while they follow their own lusts ?
A similitude of the Garden which those who keep their duty (to Allah) are promised: Therein are rivers of water unpolluted, and rivers of milk whereof the flavour changeth not, and rivers of wine delicious to the drinkers, and rivers of clear- run honey; therein for them is every kind of fruit, with pardon from their Lord. (Are those who enjoy all this) like those who are immortal in the Fire and are given boiling water to drink so that it teareth their bowels ?
Among them are some who give ear unto thee (Muhammad) till, when they go forth from thy presence they say unto those who have been given knowledge: What was that he said just now ? Those are they whose hearts Allah hath sealed, and they follow their own lusts.
While as for those who walk aright, He addeth to their guidance, and giveth them their protection (against evil).
Await they aught save the Hour, that it should come upon them unawares ? And the beginnings thereof have already come. But how, when it hath come upon them, can they take their warning ?
So know (O Muhammad) that there is no God save Allah, and ask forgiveness for thy sin and for believing men and believing women. Allah knoweth (both) your place of turmoil and your place of rest.
And those who believe say: If only a surah were revealed! But when a decisive surah is revealed and war is mentioned therein, thou seest those in whose hearts is a disease looking at thee with the look of men fainting unto death. Therefor woe unto them!
Obedience and a civil word. Then, when the matter is determined, if they are loyal to Allah it will be well for them.
Would ye then, if ye were given the command, work corruption in the land and sever your ties of kinship ?
Such are they whom Allah curseth so that He deafeneth them and maketh blind their eyes.
Will they then not meditate on the Quran, or are there locks on the hearts ?
Lo! those who turn back after the guidance hath been manifested unto them, Satan hath seduced them, and He giveth them the rein.
That is because they say unto those who hate what Allah hath revealed: We will obey you in some matters; and Allah knoweth their secret talk.
Then how (will it be with them) when the angels gather them, smiting their faces and their backs!
That will be because they followed that which angereth Allah, and hated that which pleaseth Him. Therefor He hath made their actions vain.
Or do those in whose hearts is a disease deem that Allah will not bring to light their (secret) hates ?
And if We would, We could show them unto thee (Muhammad) so that thou shouldst know them surely by their marks. And thou shalt know them by the burden of their talk. And Allah knoweth your deeds.
And verily We shall try you till We know those of you who strive hard (for the cause of Allah) and the steadfast, and till We test your record.
Lo! those who disbelieve and turn from the way of Allah and oppose the messenger after the guidance hath been manifested unto them, they hurt Allah not a jot, and He will make their actions fruitless.
O ye who believe! Obey Allah and obey the messenger, and render not your actions vain.
Lo! those who disbelieve and turn from the way of Allah and then die disbelievers, Allah surely will not pardon them.
So do not falter and cry out for peace when ye (will be) the uppermost, and Allah is with you, and He will not grudge (the reward of) your actions.
The life of the world is but a sport and a pastime. And if ye believe and ward off (evil). He will give you your wages, and will not ask of you your wordly wealth.
If He should ask it of you and importune you, ye would hoard it, and He would bring to light your (secret) hates.
Lo! ye are those who are called to spend in the way of Allah, yet among you there are some who hoard. And as for him who hoardeth, he hoardeth only from his soul. And Allah is the Rich, and ye are the poor. And if ye turn away He will exchange you for some other folk, and they will not be the likes of you.
Lo! We have given thee (O Muhammad) a signal victory,
That Allah may forgive thee of thy sin that which is past and that which is to come, and may perfect His favour unto thee, and may guide thee on a right path,
And that Allah may help thee with strong help -
He it is Who sent down peace of reassurance into the hearts of the believers that they might add faith unto their faith. Allahs are the hosts of the heavens and the earth, and Allah is ever Knower, Wise -
That He may bring the believing men and the believing women into Gardens underneath which rivers flow, wherein they will abide, and may remit from them their evil deeds - That, in the sight of Allah, is the supreme triumph -
And may punish the hypocritical men and the hypocritical women, and the idolatrous men and the idolatrous women, who think an evil thought concerning Allah. For them is the evil turn of fortune, and Allah is wroth against them and hath cursed them, and hath made ready for them hell, a hapless journeys end.
Allahs are the hosts of the heavens and the earth, and Allah is ever Mighty, Wise.
Lo! We have sent thee (O Muhammad) as a witness and a bearer of good tidings and a warner,
That ye (mankind) may believe in Allah and His messenger, and may honour Him, and may revere Him, and may glorify Him at early dawn and at the close of day.
Lo! those who swear allegiance unto thee (Muhammad), swear allegiance only unto Allah. The Hand of Allah is above their hands. So whosoever breaketh his oath, breaketh it only to his souls hurt; while whosoever keepeth his covenant with Allah, on him will He bestow immense reward.
Those of the wandering Arabs who were left behind will tell thee: Our possessions and our households occupied us, so ask forgiveness for us! They speak with their tongues that which is not in their hearts. Say: Who can avail you aught against Allah, if He intend you hurt or intend you profit ? Nay, but Allah is ever Aware of what ye do.
Nay, but ye deemed that the messenger and the believers would never return to their own folk, and that was made fairseeming in your hearts, and ye did think an evil thought, and ye were worthless folk.
And so for him who believeth not in Allah and His messenger - Lo! We have prepared a flame for disbelievers.
And Allahs is the Sovereignty of the heavens and the earth. He forgiveth whom He will, and punisheth whom He will. And Allah is ever Forgiving, Merciful.
Those who were left behind will say, when ye set forth to capture booty: Let us go with you. They fain would change the verdict of Allah. Say (unto them, O Muhammad): Ye shall not go with us. Thus hath Allah said beforehand. Then they will say: Ye are envious of us. Nay, but they understand not, save a little.
Say unto those of the wandering Arabs who were left behind: Ye will be called against a folk of mighty prowess, to fight them until they surrender; and if ye obey, Allah will give you a fair reward; but if ye turn away as ye did turn away before, He will punish you with a painful doom.
There is no blame for the blind, nor is there blame for the lame, nor is there blame for the sick (that they go not forth to war). And whoso obeyeth Allah and His messenger, He will make him enter Gardens underneath which rivers flow; and whoso turneth back, him will He punish with a painful doom.
Allah was well pleased with the believers when they swore allegiance unto thee beneath the tree, and He knew what was in their hearts, and He sent down peace of reassurance on them, and hath rewarded them with a near victory;
And much booty that they will capture. Allah is ever Mighty, Wise.
Allah promiseth you much booty that ye will capture, and hath given you this in advance, and hath withheld mens hands from you, that it may be a token for the believers, and that He may guide you on a right path.
And other (gain), which ye have not been able to achieve, Allah will compass it, Allah is Able to do all things.
And if those who disbelieve join battle with you they will take to flight, and afterward they will find no protecting friend nor helper.
It is the law of Allah which hath taken course aforetime. Thou wilt not find for the law of Allah aught of power to change.
And He it is Who hath withheld mens hands from you, and hath withheld your hands from them, in the valley of Mecca, after He had made you victors over them. Allah is Seer of what ye do.
These it was who disbelieved and debarred you from the Inviolable Place of Worship, and debarred the offering from reaching its goal. And if it had not been for believing men and believing women, whom ye know not - lest ye should tread them under foot and thus incur guilt for them unknowingly; that Allah might bring into His mercy whom He will - If (the believers and the disbelievers) had been clearly separated We verily had punished those of them who disbelieved with painful punishment.
When those who disbelieve had set up in their hearts zealotry, the zealotry of the Age of Ignorance, then Allah sent down His peace of reassurance upon His messenger and upon the believers and imposed on them the word of self-restraint, for they were worthy of it and meet for it. And Allah is Aware of all things.
Allah hath fulfilled the vision for His messenger in very truth. Ye shall indeed enter the Inviolable Place of Worship, if Allah will, secure, (having your hair) shaven and cut, not fearing. But He knoweth that which ye know not, and hath given you a near victory beforehand.
He it is Who hath sent His messenger with the guidance and the religion of truth, that He may cause it to prevail over all religion. And Allah sufficeth as a Witness.
Muhammad is the messenger of Allah. And those with him are hard against the disbelievers and merciful among themselves. Thou (O Muhammad) seest them bowing and falling prostrate (in worship), seeking bounty from Allah and (His) acceptance. The mark of them is on their foreheads from the traces of prostration. Such is their likeness in the Torah and their likeness in the Gospel - like as sown corn that sendeth forth its shoot and strengtheneth it and riseth firm upon its stalk, delighting the sowers - that He may enrage the disbelievers with (the sight of) them. Allah hath promised, unto such of them as believe and do good works, forgiveness and immense reward.
O ye who believe! Be not forward in the presence of Allah and His messenger, and keep your duty to Allah. Lo! Allah is Hearer, Knower.
O ye who believe! Lift not up your voices above the voice of the Prophet, nor shout when speaking to him as ye shout one to another, lest your works be rendered vain while ye perceive not.
Lo! they who subdue their voices in the presence of the messenger of Allah, those are they whose hearts Allah hath proven unto righteousness. Theirs will be forgiveness and immense reward.
Lo! those who call thee from behind the private apartments, most of them have no sense.
And if they had had patience till thou camest forth unto them, it had been better for them. And Allah is Forgiving, Merciful.
O ye who believe! If an evil-liver bring you tidings, verify it, lest ye smite some folk in ignorance and afterward repent of what ye did.
And know that the messenger of Allah is among you. If he were to obey you in much of the government, ye would surely be in trouble; but Allah hath endeared the faith to you and hath beautified it in your hearts, and hath made disbelief and lewdness and rebellion hateful unto you. Such are they who are the rightly guided.
(It is) a bounty and a grace from Allah; and Allah is Knower, Wise.
And if two parties of believers fall to fighting, then make peace between them. And if one party of them doeth wrong to the other, fight ye that which doeth wrong till it return unto the ordinance of Allah; then, if it return, make peace between them justly, and act equitably. Lo! Allah loveth the equitable.
The believers are naught else than brothers. Therefore make peace between your brethren and observe your duty to Allah that haply ye may obtain mercy.
O ye who believe! Let not a folk deride a folk who may be better than they (are), not let women (deride) women who may be better than they are; neither defame one another, nor insult one another by nicknames. Bad is the name of lewdness after faith. And whoso turneth not in repentance, such are evil-doers.
O ye who believe! Shun much suspicion; for lo! some suspicion is a crime. And spy not, neither backbite one another. Would one of you love to eat the flesh of his dead brother ? Ye abhor that (so abhor the other)! And keep your duty (to Allah). Lo! Allah is Relenting, Merciful.
O mankind! Lo! We have created you male and female, and have made you nations and tribes that ye may know one another. Lo! the noblest of you, in the sight of Allah, is the best in conduct. Lo! Allah is Knower, Aware.
The wandering Arabs say: We believe. Say (unto them, O Muhammad): Ye believe not, but rather say We submit, for the faith hath not yet entered into your hearts. Yet, if ye obey Allah and His messenger, He will not withhold from you aught of (the reward of) your deeds. Lo! Allah is Forgiving, Merciful.
The (true) believers are those only who believe in Allah and His messenger and afterward doubt not, but strive with their wealth and their lives for the cause of Allah. Such are the sincere.
Say (unto them, O Muhammad): Would ye teach Allah your religion, when Allah knoweth all that is in the heavens and all that is in the earth, and Allah is Aware of all things ?
They make it a favour unto thee (Muhammad) that they have surrendered (unto Him). Say: Deem not your Surrender a favour unto me; but Allah doth confer a favour on you, inasmuch as He hath led you to the Faith, if ye are earnest.
Lo! Allah knoweth the Unseen of the heavens and the earth. And Allah is Seer of what ye do.
Qaf. By the Glorious Quran,
Nay, but they marvel that a warner of their own hath come unto them; and the disbelievers say: This is a strange thing:
When we are dead and have become dust (shall we be brought back again) ? That would be a far return!
We know that which the earth taketh of them, and with Us is a recording Book.
Nay, but they have denied the truth when it came unto them, therefor they are now in troubled case.
Have they not then observed the sky above them, how We have constructed it and beautified it, and how there are no rifts therein ?
And the earth have We spread out, and have flung firm hills therein, and have caused of every lovely kind to grow thereon,
A vision and a reminder for every penitent slave.
And We send down from the sky blessed water whereby We give growth unto gardens and the grain of crops,
And lofty date-palms with ranged clusters,
Provision (made) for men; and therewith We quicken a dead land. Even so will be the resurrection of the dead.
The folk of Noah denied (the truth) before them, and (so did) the dwellers at Ar-Rass and (the tribe of) Thamud,
And (the tribe of) Aad, and Pharaoh, and the brethren of Lot,
And the dwellers in the wood, and the folk of Tubba: every one denied their messengers, therefor My threat took effect.
Were We then worn out by the first creation ? Yet they are in doubt about a new creation.
We verily created man and We know what his soul whispereth to him, and We are nearer to him than his jugular vein.
When the two Receivers receive (him), seated on the right hand and on the left,
He uttereth no word but there is with him an observer ready.
And the agony of death cometh in truth. (And it is said unto him): This is that which thou wast wont to shun.
And the trumpet is blown. This is the threatened Day.
And every soul cometh, along with it a driver and a witness.
(And unto the evil-doer it is said): Thou wast in heedlessness of this. Now We have removed from thee thy covering, and piercing is thy sight this day.
And (unto the evil-doer) his comrade saith: This is that which I have ready (as testimony).
(And it is said): Do ye twain hurl to hell each rebel ingrate,
Hinderer of good, transgressor, doubter,
Who setteth up another god along with Allah. Do ye twain hurl him to the dreadful doom.
His comrade saith: Our Lord! I did not cause him to rebel, but he was (himself) far gone in error.
He saith: Contend not in My presence, when I had already proffered unto you the warning.
The sentence that cometh from Me cannot be changed, and I am in no wise a tyrant unto the slaves.
On the day when We say unto hell: Art thou filled ? and it saith: Can there be more to come ?
And the Garden is brought nigh for those who kept from evil, no longer distant.
(And it is said): This is that which ye were promised. (It is) for every penitent and heedful one,
Who feareth the Beneficent in secret and cometh with a contrite heart.
Enter it in peace. This is the day of immortality.
There they have all that they desire, and there is more with Us.
And how many a generation We destroyed before them, who were mightier than these in prowess so that they overran the lands! Had they any place of refuge (when the judgment came) ?
Lo! therein verily is a reminder for him who hath a heart, or giveth ear with full intelligence.
And verily We created the heavens and the earth, and all that is between them, in six Days, and naught of weariness touched Us.
Therefor (O Muhammad) bear with what they say, and hymn the praise of thy Lord before the rising and before the setting of the sun;
And in the night-time hymn His praise, and after the (prescribed) prostrations.
And listen on the day when the crier crieth from a near place,
The day when they will hear the (Awful) Cry in truth. That is the day of coming forth (from the graves).
Lo! We it is Who quicken and give death, and unto Us is the journeying.
On the day when the earth splitteth asunder from them, hastening forth (they come). That is a gathering easy for Us (to make).
We are Best Aware of what they say, and thou (O Muhammad) art in no wise a compeller over them. But warn by the Quran him who feareth My threat.
